Authors
Paul-Michael Agapow
Number of Reviews
45

Title
Review for Body Melt (1993)
A sinister chemical corporation tests its new products on the 
inhabitants of a new housing estate.  Despite most of them being 
soapie stars, when they start exploding the police become concerned.
This most closely resembles the early creations of Peter Jackson ("Bad 
Taste", "Meet the Feebles") as an ultra-graphic yet funny splatfest.  
But though its heart is in the right place, "Body Melt" really doesn't 
have the Jacksonian stroke of genius or even enough of anything else 
to fill its (barely longer than one hour) running time.  Moral: it's 
easy for a deliberately bad film to be just bad.  "Body Melt" does 
feature a lot of Australian soapie stars in it, which provides some 
vicarious pleasure.
The situation, you see, is that power-vamp Shaan of the mysterious 
Vimuville Health Farm realises her head chemist is about to blab about 
their experiments on the occupants of a suburban culdesac.  Hence she 
injects him with toxic goop during some thankfully gratuitous sex.  
"The first stage is hallucinogenic!"  Stopping only to scarf some 
detergent at a service station (uh, why?), said chemist hurtles 
towards the test site.  "The second stage is glandular!"  By now 
moving into serious Bad Hair territory, he crashes the car.  "The 
third stage is ...  argh!"  Tendrils whip out of the deceased's torn 
neck and run up his nose.  Fersure.  Only later, gentle viewer, will 
you wonder what was going on here.
The police show up and you know the investigation will go nowhere when 
they're played by Gerard Kennedy and one of the ubiquitous Daddo 
brothers.  Sure enough, they excuse all the witnesses to go and get 
killed in their own scenes.  Cue the sartorially challenged police 
pathologist, who after some ferocious overacting examines the corpse 
and goggles, "He's healthy - too healthy!".  (Asides from the bubbling 
skin, protruding eyes, running sores and torn throat that is.)  It's 
obvious that the drugs are "cognitive enhancers" that will "take you 
straight into other inter-phenomonological dimensions".  Presumably it 
is within these dimensions that it is possible to understand what this 
movie is about.  But there's no cognition being enhanced in the cast 
as they're all still in the movie, waiting to explode.
Two teenagers head out from the estate and get lost, eventually ending 
up amongst a group of extras from "Deliverance".  It later will 
eventuate that their leader is the original inventor of the wonder 
drug.  This coincidence is not so much outrageous as it is standing on 
a box, mooning the audience.  But we find that out later, after the 
local retards have killed a stuffed kangaroo with a rock and started 
to feast on its pituitary system.  "It's an adrenal gland!"  shrieks 
one of the teens, showing an admirable identification of red, gloppy 
internal organs.  The scene cuts before the other teen can call out, 
"Look, it's the cortico-hypothalamic axis!", but they are dead soon 
anyway.
Back in suburbia, it seems (set warm grandmotherly tone to ON) that 
nice Lisa McCune is playing a young pregnant wife.  Aww.  But her 
doctor is pumping Vimuville drugs into her!  Oh no!  But just when it 
looks like she might survive, she is disembowelled by her own foetus.  
Now, that'd never happen on "Blue Heelers".  By now, even the police 
suspect something is wrong and skedaddle to the health farm where 
everyone is exploding.
It's gross, it's tacky, it's cheap.  But it's not enough of any of 
those things to make it really fun, even for its short length.  The 
pulsing electronic music and some moments of direction (particularly 
in the opening credits) are certainly well done, but don't make up for 
plot idiocies and the terribly banal dialogue.  [*/misfire] and "The 
Young Doctors" on the Sid and Nancy scale.
------
p-m agapow (agapow@latcs1.oz.au)
"There is no adventure, there is no romance, there is only trouble and desire."

Title
Review for Gattaca (1997)
It is the near future.  Ubiquitous genetic screening and engineering 
has divided society in two: the genetic gifted, their organic problems 
ironed out and their futures assured; and the "in-valids", those whose 
chromosomes make them a poor risk and suited for only menial labour.  
Vincent (Hawke) is the result of a natural birth, untouched by the 
genetic scalpel.  But he dreams of going to the stars and when chance 
comes to assume the place of the genetically perfect Jerome (Law) he 
jumps at it and enters the starfaring Gattaca corporation.  However a 
police investigation brought about by the murder of one of Vincent's 
new colleagues threatens his identity.
Films with broad themes often stumble, particularly those adapted from 
books.  The metaphors that can suspend disbelief in print, on film may 
appear exaggerated and cartoonish.  Recall "1984" and "Brave New 
World".  Thus, "Gattaca" is fighting an uphill battle.  Despite this, 
first-time director and writer Andrew Niccol has achieved something 
rather wonderful, a good looking picture with no glitzy special 
effects nor choreographed fighting but instead a thoughtful, 
intelligent air.
Perhaps he learnt his lessons well from predecessors.  The large 
echoing sets are reminiscent of Godard's "Alphaville" with their 
depiction of the future-as-present.  Conversely, the past-as-future 
gets a run (via "Bladerunner") in the details on the set.  Large 
finned sedans abound, Vincent's childhood home has an antique fridge 
(that I remember from a student shared household in the late 1980s), 
he reads worn handset books on astrogation.  The identical suited 
masses of the Gattaca corporation could come straight from 
"Metropolis" or "2001".
Neither Hawke nor Thurman are (yet) great actors, yet they are oddly 
suited to their roles.  Hawke's Vincent is an energetic dreamer whose 
optimism has been filed away to leave a repressed, fearful soul.  
Thurman (as Irene, a coworker of Vincent) has an alien look and manner 
suited to the genetically blessed.  The supporting cast is full of 
rather nice performances as well: Jude Law as an empty and angry 
genetic superman, Gore Vidal as a patrician bureaucrat ("I haven't a 
violent bone in my body," he sniffs, without being in anyway 
figurative), Alan Arkin as a grungy old-hand detective.  Resisting the 
Hollywood ploy of sprinkling one-liners through the script, "Gattaca" 
nevertheless slips in some sly humour.  Irene sneaks a hair of 
Jerome/Vincent's in for genetic analysis, and browses the resultant 
pages of polynucleotide strings like a womens magazine.  The dour 
police, anonymous in identical fedoras and grey trenchcoats, are 
dubbed "hoovers" - two jokes for the price of one.
Then we come to the heart of "Gattaca", the idea of rational 
discrimination.  When the frail child Vincent is turned away by a 
school - which can't afford the insurance in case something happens to 
him - their bias is completely sensible and still wrong.  (The 
parallels to HIV-positive children is irresistible.)  When he is 
refused a job because of his genetic profile, the action is entirely 
logical.  Despite his dedication and superb work-record, his true 
identity would lead to his firing.  You can't help but think about 
racism and sexism (and all the other "isms") and how one doesn't need 
prejudice - just unfeeling rationality - to support discrimination.  
If a system tipped in the favour of a particular class recruits the 
best candidates, it will select those like itself.  In "Gattaca" this 
is the genetically pure, for our own world white heterosexual males.  
And this requires not the slightest bigotry.  Perhaps the road to hell 
is paved not with good intentions, but with cold logic.
"Gattaca" leaves us much to think of on these lines, an issue that 
is highly relevant in an age rich with information and genetic 
technology.  Yet it does not look at this starry eyed.  Vincent 
sacrifices a lot, even something of himself, to reach his goals.  His 
victories are small, but touching.  I would be tempted to give 
"Gattaca" the highest score and recommendation, but two things prevent 
me.  First, it is perhaps slightly - just 10 minutes - longer than the 
material will bear.  Second, some viewers will find its slightly aloof 
air too remote to enjoy.  But otherwise it comes well recommended 
[***/interesting] and "I Heard the Owl Call My Name" on the Sid and 
Nancy scale.
------
paul-michael agapow (agapow@computer.org), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse
"There is no adventure, there is no romance, there is only trouble and desire."
Archived at 

Title
Review for Alien: Resurrection (1997)
It's 200 years later and they still haven't fixed the poor lighting 
and dripping problems aboard starships.  The tireless alien-hunting 
Ripley awakes on a military research vessel to find that she's not 
dead, just cloned.  But there are some strange fish splashing about in 
her gene pool, and when the (also resurrected) aliens run amok, she 
falls in with a band of amoral pirates and escape while engaging in 
many widely framed metaphors for motherhood and birth.
A fundamental law of Hong Kong movies and Star Trek is that death is 
tragic but only a minor inconvenience.  It looks as though that rule 
will now have to be extended to the Alien franchise, with La Sigourney 
being decanted from a two centuries old blood sample.  But even given 
modern biotechnology, is there any energy in the fun loving hijinks of 
everyone's favourite polymorphic lifeform?  That's a more complex 
question, complicated by the poor reception of its predecessor 
(Alien^3) and the knives being sharpened for an expected failure.
While incompletely realised, "Resurrection" is quite good.  It 
harkens back to the flavour of the first film, a Victorian gothic 
horror novel set in space, a shifty psychological thriller.  (As an SF 
or horror film, the second installment "Aliens" was a good blockbuster 
action picture.)  The characters and story exist in a moral vacuum 
with extra stress contributed by their unknown allegiances.  The 
Ripley clone gives the impression that at any moment she may back the 
alien side, the pirates (who guiltlessly hijack cryofreezed bodies for 
experiments) are motivated by little but self-interest.
French director Jeunet (here bereft of his other half, Caro, from 
"City of Lost Children" and "Delicatessen") brings a worldly European 
air to the Alien franchise, with the occasional surreal touch.  This 
is best exemplified by the choice of actors, from the decidedly 
non-glamourous Ron Perlman as a chauvinist tough guy to the even less 
glamourous Dominique Pinon as a grungy crippled mechanic.  (Both are 
Jeunet and Caro alumni.)  Weaver is fabulous as the Ripley clone, with 
an almost wolfish quality to her.  Tired of other people's mistakes, 
almost too tired to live there's an ineffable dangerousness to her 
character.  Winona Ryder as a guilt-stricken pirate fares less well: 
as the character with the most depth after Ripley her performance is 
not as good as hoped but better than expected.  (It's back to 
generation-X dramas for you, dearie.)  The cast spark off each other 
in some snappy dialogue.  ("Must be a chick thing," sneers Perlman 
after La Sigourney goes bananas with an incinerator.)  Throw in a few 
well-framed action pieces - there's a nice underwater chase scene that 
segues into an equally nice fight on a ladder - and you've got not a 
bad little picture.  The whole motherhood analogy schtick from 
"Aliens" is here revved up to the nth degree, it not being so much a 
subtext as a supertext.  If Ripley ever gets to a shrink, I can see 
the two of them writing books and going onto talk shows for years.  
("On Ricki Lake today: My child surrogate died and then my new child 
surrogate destroyed a military base.  Now make me over!")
But "little" may be the problem.  To convince the sceptics, 
"Resurrection" has got to go the hard yards and make itself stand out.  
Although it wisely doesn't try to outdo the previous entries, it also 
doesn't try to be enough of its own thing.  The evil corporation has 
here been replaced by the evil government.  (Who, hilariously, wish to 
use the aliens for "urban pacification".  Drop one of them aliens onto 
the West Bank and let's see how long it lasts.)  For all the 
quirkiness of the characters, there really isn't enough time for each 
to develop and so several die in that uncomfortable period between 
when you can recognise them but before you know their name.  While 
there are some pleasing intelligent points to the story - "The aliens 
are loose!  Evacuate the ship!" - there are plot stupidities to match 
- "Hey, a hole in the deck made by acid!  I wonder if I stick my head 
down there if it get torn off?".
In summary, it's a pleasing addition to the series that while not 
reaching quite as high as intended, at least manages to hold itself 
with pride.  If there must be another entry, let's hope it continues 
and extends the good work.  [***/interesting] and "A Better Tomorrow 
3" on the Sid and Nancy scale.
------
paul-michael agapow (agapow@computer.org), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse
"There is no adventure, there is no romance, there is only trouble and desire."

Title
Review for X Files, The (1998)
This is how it is: everyone's favourite FBI agents are once again down 
on their luck, the eponymous files having been closed.  But Mulder 
(David Duchovny) is contacted by an old friend of his father (Martin 
Landau) who explains that he is aware of a high level conspiracy to 
unleash a plague on mankind.  Knowing this will at the very least 
explain the final season of "Space 1999", Mulder cons Scully (Gillian 
Anderson) into donning an awesome pair of heels and rekindling their 
unresolved sexual tension.  Equipped with their trusty torchs, mobile 
phones and clothes in every imaginable shade of black, our 
conspiratorial duo investigate a bomb blast and a mysterious 
excavation site.  It's not long before Scully is conveniently taken 
prisoner and Mulder has to trudge through snow to save her.
There's a lot to admire about "The X Files" as a TV show.  It keyed 
into a previous unmined vein of interest in conspiracy and paranoia, 
paid a long overdue visit to the horror genre, managed to laugh at 
itself while telling some fun and well-directed stories.  It's a very 
likeable show.  This may explain why after seeing the movie there is 
this vague feeling of guilt that you didn't like it more.
The beginning is admirable, drawing you in with a great surtitle for a 
hookline: "North Texas - 35000 BC".  After this creepy opening 
sequence, we see the two discredited agents working a case in Dallas 
that features a great explosion and the movie's sole point of parody 
(which revolves around Mulder's wooden expression).  Things then get 
very busy with secret meetings, internal agency hearings and help 
crawling out of the woodpile at every turn.  To be fair, it's only 
near the end that you realise that you are just watching a two hour 
episode of the TV show.
Is that so bad?  Movie and TV can be very different experiences, if 
only due to length.  "The X Files" shows a few scars gained in the 
move.  The soundtrack blairs stridently in too many scenes.  A 
rollcall of characters parade past the screen and then disappear.  The 
malevolent Cancer Man gets no chance to work his evil and those 
paragons of geekdom, the Lone Gunmen, are on screen for a full 20 
seconds.  But worst of all, over a two hour period the movie is 
sufficiently drawn-out to let you dwell on plot intricacies.  (Plot 
intricacies and Scully's magnificent pumps.  Excuse me.)  At the end 
of the day, the plot makes little sense.  In a conspiracy the viewer 
should be convinced that while motives may be unknown, the action is 
in some light be consistent and plausible.  But "The X Files" slowly 
but surely breaches this barrier.  The unseen conspiracy cannot make 
sense.  The actions of some characters seems to come out of a vacuum.  
And at the end of the movie, we are back to square one - the X Files 
are re-opened and conspirators and whistleblowers are at work again, 
with no ground gained or lost.
Hardcore X-philes will race off to see the movie immediately and 
probably get a decent bang-for-buck out of it.  More casual fans will 
still enjoy it but can proceed more leisurely, maybe waiting for video 
(which I predict will not be long).  Those who have never seen "The X 
Files" will have trouble understanding any of this.  Conversely, the 
hoopla over having to know the last few episodes to understand the 
movie is severely overstated - a nodding acquaintance with the main 
characters and issues is all that is necessary.  [**/ok] and unmarked 
helicopters on the Sid and Nancy scale.
"The X Files"
Released 1998.
Directed by Rob Bowman.
Written by Chris Carter and Frank Spotniz.
Music by Mike Oldfield and Mark Snow.
Starring David Duchovny, Gillian Anderson, Martin Landau, Armin Mueller-Stahl,
        Blythe Danner, William B. Davis, Mitch Pileggi.
--
Paul-Michael Agapow (agapow@latcs1.oz.au)
Postviews SF/F reviews & mailing-list at www.cs.latrobe.edu.au/~agapow/Postviews

Title
Review for Lost in Space (1998)
That horribly smarmy Robinson family get (woah!) lost amid a veneer 
of plot, many special effects and minimal logic.  Surprisingly enough, 
it's all quite fun.
In its never-ending search to drag more people to the movies, 
Hollywood has resurrected yet another old TV series for the nostalgia 
value.  (I, for one, have zero fond memories of that rather dreadful 
series.  Go and look at a few episodes sometime - it's singularly 
awful.)  Wrapped up in muchos SFX, bankable stars and few surprises, 
one shouldn't hold much hope.  But as cynical as the whole exercise 
is, "Lost in Space" is rather entertaining.  It's mind-candy to be 
sure, but inoffensive mind-candy.
In some ways, the movie is quite faithful to the premise of the old 
series.  In a future where the Earth is on the edge of ecological 
collapse and the technology for buttons has been lost, Professors 
Robinson (Hurt) and Robinson (Rogers) are taking a ship to a nearby 
star.  There they will build a hypergate-type thingie to allow Earth 
people to pour through and despoil another planet.  But the evil 
Sedition (evil largely for not being the Robinsons) wants to get there 
first and sics the rabid Dr Smith (Oldman) onto them.  The Professors 
Robinson, their nuclear family and Smith don their many velcro'd and 
zippered uniforms and then get "lost in space".
The plot is garbage on most scientific and even logical levels.  
Given the profligate way the Robinsons live, I'm not surprised that 
the Earth is running out of resources.  All that pollution seems to 
effect their brains, because they later forget that planets exert 
gravity.  (It's amazing what the user manuals to spacecraft don't 
mention.)  In many cringeworthy scenes, Dad Robinson is made to be 
ashamed that he spent too much time saving the Earth, and too little 
supervising young Will's crosstime experiments.
Most bizarre of all, they let the murderous Dr Smith loose on their 
ship.  Now you know and I know and any sane person would know that if 
Gary Oldman stows away on your spaceship [presidential jet / apartment 
building / etc.], it is only a matter of time before he goes spastic 
with large quantities of automatic weapons and kills everyone.  
(Warning: should you ever be in this situation and Gary appears to be 
quiescent as he takes large quantities of drugs - this is no reason to 
relax.  The drug-taking Gary is just a larval stage, and soon the 
ur-Oldman will emerge, go spastic with large quantities of automatic 
weapons and kill everyone.  Do not let your guard down.  Similar 
warnings are issued for John Malkovich, Steve Buscemi and Christopher 
Walken.)
But as said above, "Lost In Space" charms despite or perhaps because 
of its cliches.  Dr Smith chews much scenery and snarls out cutting 
one-liners.  (At first the filmmakers keep him relatively under 
control, but by the end of the picture just stand back shouting, "Look 
out, he's gonna blow!".)  Matt LeBlanc, who plays a dumb, 
over-sexed lug on "Friends", here plays pilot Don West as a dumb, 
over-sexed lug.  As a consequence, he is involved in by-the-numbers 
sexual tension with the eldest Robinson daughter and some nice space 
fight scenes (in very cute fighters adapted to 3D combat).  Penny 
Robinson makes an entertaining, angst-ridden teenager who keeps a very 
funny half confessional / half fantasy video diary.  Will pals around 
amusingly with the robot.  William Hurt - who has build an acting 
career of looking vaguely disconcerted by everything - be it 
castration, devolution into primordial energy or imprisonment in a 
Latin American jail - looks appropriately agonised by every little 
decision.  Only Judy and Professor Mom Robinson come across as a 
little dull, although they are at least competent, a thankful point of 
divergence with the original.  Slap in some glossy SFX, big 
explosions, a groovy set of end credits and you get nicely entertained 
for your 10 bucks.  At times the movie does slow down, chiefly where they 
insist on pursuing the plot or blabbering about Big Issues and the 
Importance of Family, but these occasions are mercifully brief.
Do we need another brash, big and meaningless picture? Maybe not. But 
in a balanced diet of entertainment and edification, "Lost in Space" 
makes a worthy entry on the entertainment side. [***] and lemonade on 
the Sid and Nancy scale.
--
paul-michael agapow (agapow@computer.org), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse
"There is no adventure, there is no romance, there is only trouble and desire."

Title
Review for Virus (1999)
Taking a leaf from the Daleks' book, a sentient informational lifeform
tries to invade Earth. Fortunately, it is defeated by Jamie-Lee Curtis
and one of the lesser Baldwin brothers. Unfortunately, it is defeated by
Jamie-Lee Curtis and one of the lesser Baldwin brothers.
It happens every year, regular as clockwork. No one knows why. They dash
unthinkingly towards their doom, the horde sweeping over the edge into
the abyss. Perhaps it is the rhythm of nature. Perhaps it is something
primal. But every year, a film crew tries to remake "Alien".
There are minor differences of course. Sometimes the monster is a robot,
sometimes a mutant. Sometimes the victims are trapped in the arctic,
sometimes in a city. And sometimes they are a bunch of schmucks stuck on
a Russian freighter in the middle of the Pacific. 
Of course trawling the depths of such suckiness can sometimes be
tremendously entertaining, such as the loopily wet "Leviathan", the
colourful "Hardware", the demented "DeepStar Six". But connoisseurs of
crap can be tragically let down when something doesn't suck as much as
it nearly does. And let's face it: Jamie-Lee Curtis in a sou'wester is
no ones idea of fun.
For those of you that didn't catch "Virus" at the cinema (which from the
box office figures is - well - everybody), the story goes like this: the
crew of the "Minnow" are in trouble. Their cargo barge is taking water.
Their ship is running into a hurricane. And their skipper is Donald
Sutherland. The uninsured cargo barge sinks and Donald retreats to his
cabin, to clutch a pistol and gaze at a photo taken during his youth.
"I've let you down, boy," he sighs. If you weren't watching closely, you
might think he was talking in character. But Gilligan (Curtis) spots a
disabled Russian freighter and they board, hoping to make a mint in
salvage. Unbeknownst to them, a huge cloud of static electricity has
drifted across space, zapped Mir, telneted down to the ship and is
looking for more copies of Microsoft Office to infect. Unbeknowst that
is, until they find the sole demented Russian survivor for some quick
plot exposition.  (Courtesy of Joanna Pacula, whose chief qualifications
for playing a Russian scientist seem to be the fact she has short hair
and a funny surname.) See, it _is_ just like "Gilligan's Island". 
Let me cut to the chase: it's lucky the "Minnow" has such a fearless
(and large) crew because they die one by one or get turned into
bio-mechanical killing machines. Ginger is left alone in the critically
important generator room and just like the dizzy-headed movie star he
is, goes to investigate a noise and is strangled by a powercable. The
Howells and Maryanne split up and blunder around alone in the ships dark
corridors until they get eaten. The Professor rigs up a complicated
device so he can escape the ship. Of course, it's a long standing law of
trashy monster films that characters die in order of increasing
socio-economic standing. The Professor, being the token black, is thus
doomed never to see the end of the film. But for those who like to keep
their finger on the pulse of popular culture, it's a hopeful sign of
progress that he dies after the alcoholic, the Cuban and the redneck.
(And after the Maori, who has a Sydney accent.) My, what a long way
we've come. And true to 20 years of playing twitchy villains that betray
everyone, Donald Sutherland betrays everyone. Tragically, Jamie-Lee is
half-drowned, burnt and soaked with petrol but just refuses to take her
clothes off. Damn.
Oh, there's some nice Harryhausen style effects as robots chase
Jamie-Lee and Baldwin X around the ship, but it's largely just a dull
routine affair, not even bad enough to be good. I'm sure that the rights
have been sold and in a few years we'll see a cheapie sequel starring a
different Baldwin brother. [*/misfire] and a nagging chest cold on the
Sid & Nancy scale.

Title
Review for Avengers, The (1998)
Insufferably mannered twerp (Fiennes) and fashion victim (Thurman) are 
supposedly secret agents set out to stop weather-controlling madman 
(Connery).  Despite the obvious charisma imbalance, the dearest wishes of 
the audience and severe editing, they succeed.  Bugger.
"One should never fear getting wet," slathers nerdish supervillian Connery 
to lust-thang and world's least plausible scientist Thurman.  But he's 
forgotten that absolutely everyone is wet in this soggy, lumpish remake of 
the cult TV series.  For those who came in late: "The Avengers" were a duo 
of elegantly stylish superspies who nonchalantly dispatched grave threats 
to British (and global) security every week.  Never mind that the plot 
quickly degenerated into a parody of themselves, a disjointed haiku of 
illogical setpieces, non-sequiturs, and contrived sequences:
But it was fun, and you might think it was ripe for a remake, or a 
reinvention (a la "Lost In Space").  Of course, you might also think that 
my grandmother was a tap-dancing Martian.  For "The Avengers" (or as we 
might call it "The English Patient 2", except in this case the patient is 
the film, DOA) is a dreary, incoherent mess.
It's not easy to say just what's wrong with this film, because everything 
is wrong.  We meet Ralph Fiennes as the ultradangerous agent John Steed.  
Dangerous, because you fear that at any moment he will don an anorak and 
start to talk earnestly about trainspotting.  He's on the job because the 
hightech satellite system that (stifle your laughter) controls Britain's 
weather has been sabotaged.  Could it be the work of Dr Peel, the insectile 
method nymphet Uma Thurman?  No, her mission is to use up the stockpile of 
blue eye-shadow left over from the 1960s.  So after some single entendres, 
our dull duo are off.  And then they're off to solve the case.
They go to talk to the eccentric Sir August, who turns out to be a toupee 
with Sean Connery hiding underneath.  After he and Uma engage in some 
sub-"Carry On" sexual banter, Fiennes is attacked by August's strangely 
silent minions.  You might think that these henchmen say nothing because 
they are actually the set carpenters, hauled on to fill in the gaping 
crevasses in the screenplay.  No, they are silent because they have been 
struck dumb by the quality of dialogue around.  In fact, one minion 
suddenly develops stigmata during one of Fiennes and Thurman's romantic 
clinches.  *thinks* No, just a moment, that was me.
There's a twin of Emma Peel running around at this point.  No, they never 
explain this.
The baddies drop a map so our tepid twosome can find the secret lair.  
Connery meets with his cohorts, who are all dressed in (I kid you not) 
brightly coloured teddy bear suits.  Connery explains this is so no-one can 
be recognised, and I find that explanation strangely plausible.  Fiennes 
and Thurman try to spark their areactive screen chemistry, but (alas) there 
is no catalyst that powerful.  However Uma strains so hard that you can 
actually see her _trying to remember her lines_!  Dispirited by their 
failure, the comatose couple are forced to reveal that the real mastermind 
is the co-head of their organisation, the blind (and strangely like a 
Thunderbird) Father.
There's that twin again.  What is that all about?
Connery, determined to never work again, dons a kilt and threatens the 
leaders of the free world.  Just what the leaders of the free world are 
doing in London, is never explained.  I guess after Connery buries London 
in snow, they bugger off home.  ("Sod this English weather.")  Uma decides 
that the only way to get to the bottom of things is to don a red catsuit 
with leather hotpants (which looks much worse than you can possibly 
imagine) and get captured.  While captured she begins to hallucinate, 
making the audience very jealous.  But Ralph and her get together again and 
the movie flickers to life briefly as they go mano-a-mano with Connery and 
his henchman.  (That's hench-man.  One.  Count 'em, one.  Ohh, it's just so 
horrible.)
"Still suspicious?"  apostrophises Uma.  "Just wondering if you bought me 
here under false pretenses," winces Ralph.  And the audience can then cry 
out, "Yes, yes, oh yes!!"  Avoid this dull, unworthy mess.  [0/bomb] and a 
bad acid flashback on the Sid & Nancy scale.
--
Paul-Michael Agapow (p.agapow@ic.ac.uk), Dept. Biology, Imperial College
"We were too young, we lived too fast and had too much technology ..."

Title
Review for Star Trek: Insurrection (1998)
Star Trek the Decaffeinated Generation are ask to clear a planet of 
its peace-nik native inhabitants, get self-righteous and engage in a 
few ludicrous fight scenes.  Fin.
Delayed that it is, and futile a task that it is (how many people's 
minds am I going to change on the subject of "Star Trek"?), a review 
of the latest Trek cinematic offering is in order.  But more than 
review the film, I'd like to think out loud about Trek, science 
fiction and the cinema.  And although it will be interpreted 
otherwise, this is not a Trekkie-bash.  (Or Trekker-bash.)
For those who came in late: it seems like the Federation have 
discovered a source of Plotdevicium on a distant planet, which acts as 
a fountain-of-youth.  Recovery of the Plotdevicium requires the help 
of the Son'a, a race of aliens whose names sound like cough medicines.
Naturally the Son'a insist on doing it the "Viking and coastal village 
way" (remember: ugly aliens are evil aliens), meaning the native Baku 
must be evacuated.  Data goes haywire (again) and blows the cover of 
the undercover observers on the planet surface.  (Later he is talked 
down by Picard singing Gilbert and Sullivan songs.  Don't ask.)  As 
the natives now have tumbled to the Federation's plan, there's nothing 
for it but for Picard to romance the immortal native with the highest 
"schwing!"  factor.  (And if you wanted to know, immortals look like 
30-something white Californians.  To contrast them with the ugly 
aliens, they have names like modular Swedish furniture.)  Thus 
politicized and empowered, the Enterprise crew tells the Federation 
where they can stick their Plotdevicium and goes rogue to protect the 
natives and fight the evil and ugly Son'a.
That's not exactly a promising start, but this need not matter if it 
leads to some decent action or drama.  This happens to some degree.  
(There is a few nice jokes about Worf going through Klingon puberty.)  
Unfortunately there are some terribly cringeworthy moments in between, 
many involving the Federation's most dangerous piece of technology, 
the android Data.  (Proof that getting a plausible skintone and eye 
colour for robots is too hard for even the top scientists of the 23rd 
century.)  Data gets to deadpan lines like "lock and load" and be 
taught the value of play by a child.  (Remember those agonizing scenes 
in "Terminator 2" where John Connor pals around with the T1?  This is 
much worse.)  Picard's romance is lukewarm at best, so his concern for 
his lust-mate and her fate seems forced.  Indeed there's something 
oddly virginal and coy about the relationships in the movie.  Even 
when Troi and Riker romp naked in a bubble-bath, you can't believe 
that they'll ever actually have sex.  (Or that we have left the 1980s 
far behind.)  It's relentlessly PG. A similar comment can be made 
about the violence within the film.  The scowling Son'a villain 
(played by F Murray Abraham) seems more petulant than malevolent.
Having said that, I have to give full credit to the scriptwriters for 
something that we should see more of but don't: a cast of mature 
women.  A movie where you can have three significant female characters 
(Troi, Crusher, Anja), clearly not in their 20s anymore and not 
pretending to be, who are accomplished, active and sexually attractive 
is a rare thing.  I wish this wasn't something so rare, but kudos to 
the filmmakers anyway.
Going back to the character of Riker , it seems Frakes is unable to 
direct himself as an actor.  At least this is my interpretation of the 
terrible mugging performance that he delivers when he appears as 
Riker.  Looking more and more like a teddy-bear on steroids everyday, 
it becomes hard to believe that the Enterprise crew stands between the 
natives and genocide when Riker is grinning from ear to ear.  Given 
the light tone that pervades the whole picture, someone else should 
direct the next film, preferably one of the creators on the meatier 
old Trek films.
Don't misunderstand me - "Insurrection" isn't a bad film.  Genial 
perhaps, not predictable but unsurprising, maybe lightweight.  Even 
given the more ridiculous moments as listed above, about the worst you 
could say is to wish you'd waited for video.  It is certainly not near 
the worst of the Trek series.  (Number 5 has that category stitched 
up.)  But as you watch the film, the fairyfloss texture lets your mind 
wander to other subjects.
Is "Trek" science fiction?  Is it even speculative fiction?  Barely, 
by the evidence of this film.  Characters sprout long strings of 
gobbledygook in order to get themselves in and out of situations.  
(Pick 4 words from the following list and shuffle them together: 
reverse, phase, flux, radiation, energy, particle, resonance.)  It 
isn't so much that their words are meaningless but that they are just 
a way to create and solve dramatic situations.  This would not be so 
bad - it's just a story - except that the point has long been passed 
where there was any sort of consistency.  At least two items from 
"Insurrection" (immortality and defeating force shields by "matching 
resonances") should change the shape of the Trek universe forever.  
Want to bet they don't?  In Trek, the more things change, the more 
they stay the same.
Indeed, Trek has stopped trying to explain itself at all.  What if you 
had never seen any Star Trek.  Could you make head or tail of 
"Insurrection"?  What if you had just seen Trek Classic?  Would that 
help?  To a large extent, Trek has become strange people doing 
unexplained things in implausible ways for unapparent reasons.  It 
pitches itself solely at the (admittedly huge) fan market, those who 
know.  (And for whom the series is familiar people doing the same 
things in any convenient way for the usual reasons.)  The very 
definition of a movie franchise, it has become a commodity.  Every two 
years, the market shall be given 90 minutes of film.  File next to 
bread and milk.
Is this a problem?  If the Trek faithful are kept happy, what's the 
issue?  Perhaps nothing.  But I sense an opportunity wasted here, a 
chance for big screen SF, a chance for spectacle, a chance for Patrick 
Stewart to do some fine acting.  As in a franchise there's a weakened 
drive for quality and novelty, this opportunity will probably go 
wanting.  In 20 years time, Trek will be just like the James Bond 
series, pushing out more of the same, never being very bad but never 
being very good either.
Hmm.  For such a lightweight film, I've been (unintentionally) left 
with a lot of thought.  [**/ok] and a mild cheese on the Sid and Nancy 
scale.
"Star Trek: Insurrection"
Released 1998.
Directed by Jonathan Frakes.  
Starring Patrick Stewart, Jonathan Frakes, Brent Spiner, LeVar
   Burton, Michael Dorn, Gates McFadden, Marina Sirtis, F. Murray
   Abraham, Donna  Murphy.
--
Paul-Michael Agapow (p.agapow@ic.ac.uk), Biology, Imperial College
"We were too young, we lived too fast and had too much technology ..."

Title
Review for Mr. India (1987)
India's first superhero, periodically invisible and with little
fashion sense, battles a thin metaphor for British colonial
policy, illustrated by several songs and far too many cute
children.
To be clear, I'm not poking fun at Indian cinema.  (To even
speak of "Indian cinema" is perhaps as meaningless as talking of
"European cinema".)  But part of the fun of "Mr India" is the
surprise at a picture made with different sensibilities and
expectations.  Add some purple dialogue, over-the-top acting and
kitchen sink story telling and you have a delightfully wacky
concoction. It's like this ...
The evil Mugambo, looking like Inspector Morse after an
accident with a tube of bronzing cream, plans to rule India (and
then the world!)  by turning Indians against each other.  He
plots in his lair, decorated from the garage sale of a James Bond
supervillian: complete with golf carts to ferry visitors around,
troops in colour-coded uniforms, the globe of the world gripped
by a talon and - natch - the obligatory pit of acid.  And for
those of you who like your metaphors thinly veiled, Mugambo wears
a "Sgt.  Peppers" style British Army uniform and gloats, "Did
Indians learn nothing of their history?".  But our lovable
mahogany-coloured psychopath maintains his humility by only
referring to himself in the third person: "Mugambo ho-shu-a!"
(Mugambo is pleased!).
When not ordering his troops to jump in the acid (where after
a few clumsy edits they turn into skeletons, "Mugambo ho-shu-a!")
he issues orders to his minions to "spread destruction".
(Monday, 9.30-10.30: spread destruction; 10.30-11.00: pick up
laundry.)  First his lackeys must acquire a house in Bombay to
store weaponry.  But his two sidekicks (who look like Omar Sharif
and a Californian TM instructor) make the unfortunate mistake of
choosing the hostel run by the lovable yet fashion-blind Arun.
Our hero (who, there being no "Gap" in Bombay, spends the entire
movie in a tweedy sports jacket and giggle-hat) is raising a
house of rhythm-deficient orphans.  There they play, sing, get
woken up by jets of ice-cold water and remain blissfully unaware
of the provisions of the Child Protection Act of 1988.  Soon the
kids, raised on a movie diet of "Breakin' 2: Electric Bugaloo"
are grooving and rapping out the first song ("That football of
ours gives us much joy!")  after a journalist takes away their
toy.  Later she gets back at the hungry orphans by feeding them
donuts and fried food.  The children are now happy, knowing they
can look forward to a lifetime of atherosclerosis and coronary
bypasses.
Quicker than you can say "Mugambo ho-shu-a!" the bad guys are
roughing up Arun and his strangely camp friend Calendar.  (This
may be a Batman/Robin-esque subtext.  Then again, it may not be a
subtext.)  But Arun acquires an invisibility device from his old
professor and becomes (drumroll) "Mr India"!  He can fight
the evil criminals!  "Mugambo not so ho-shu-a!"  The now
transparent social worker can also romance the journalist, for his
poor fashion sense is no longer obvious.  Needless to say there
are many songs, wind machines, blazing fires and gushing
fountains in this segment.  (Boy, are there gushing fountains.
If this film had been made 40 years ago, it would have violated
the Hays Code on metaphorical value alone.) Meanwhile there are
massive protests in the streets in favour of Mr India. (What are
they saying? "Superheroes - Yes! Suntanned colonial oppressors -
No!")
But the lovers' idyll is broken when one of the children is
killed in the fairground by the old exploding clown trick.
Showing a careful study of the last two decades of B-grade
cinema, Mr India / Arun gets captured, goes crazy-ape bonkers and
disposes of Mugambo's minions.  The children joyfully help him
gun the guards down.  And then, of course, Mr India goes
mano-a-mano with Mugambo (sans invisibility field, naturally),
declaiming "All it takes is one ordinary Indian to stop you".
Apparently ordinary Indians know how to do spin kicks and back
flips.  And that's the sound of you being struck around the head
with that damn metaphor again.
And that's not the half of it. There isn't the time to
mention the appearance of "Dr Fu Manchu" (in a red velvet suit!),
a faux-Hawaiian musical number gone feral Vegas and done in
blackface, the sound effects straight from "Australia's Funniest
Home Videos" ("Oh-oh, looks like Mugambo's going to blow up
India...") and that damn hat ...
Delightfully loopy, the length of this film does diffuse some
of the enjoyment.  But with judicious use of a video recorder
there's no reason why you too can't be bopping to Arun's
bodacious rap and shouting "Mugambo ho-shu-a!".
[***/interesting] and Sauerkraut westerns on the Sid and Nancy
scale.  And remember - "According to our computers Mr India loves
everything in India!"
------
paul-michael agapow (agapow@latcs1.oz.au)
Postviews SF/F reviews site: 

Title
Review for Frighteners, The (1996)
[laserdisc/film] "The Frighteners"
In a provincial town, people are dying suddenly and inexplicably.
Snooping around the edges of the mystery is the smarmy but
disturbed "psychic investigator" Frank Bannister (Fox) whom many
suspect of being involved.  Bannister, who fears they may be
correct, is only slightly fraudulent for he can see the dead and
the sinister figure which stalks the town.
Whoever the genius was that recognised the talent in New
Zealand director Peter Jackson should be congratulated.  His
first three features ("Bad Taste", "Braindead" aka "DeadAlive",
"Meet the Feebles") were low budget, disgusting gorefests that
were a lot of fun but are hardly the sort of thing that would
encourage you to see Jackson as a director of Major Serious
Projects.  Yet "Heavenly Creatures" confirmed this vision.
"The Frighteners", although not his best picture and
sometimes illogical, is yet further evidence.  It shows a
perceptive balance in juggling a humorous, sad and even
frightening story in an economical framework.  The sad sight of
Bannister's half-complete dream house gives way to comic misfit
ghosts to angry poltergeists literally straining the structure of
an old house.  Even once in a while the plot throws us a curve
ball but neither this nor the extensive but subdued special
effects are allowed to dominate.  Jackson insists that the story
be told and that these other things are there merely to support
the tale.
As one wonders who would have picked Jackson, a similar thing
might be said of Michael J Fox.  It's all too easy to cast the
perpetually cherubic Fox as cloying or overly-earnest, the legacy
of too many years in "Family Ties".  Yet he comfortably slips
into the role of the downbeat Bannister, an shyster but a
pathetic and broken one, just skimming the surface of life.  The
seriousness of this central character is balanced by his spectral
sidekicks, including an unrecognisable John Astin, and lunatic
Jeffrey Coombs playing a deranged FBI agent (in what may well be
a sly "X Files" reference).
In truth the climax is rather cluttered and in parts very
Hollywood but not to any extent that ruins the picture.  In
summary "The Frighteners" is a well constructed and entertaining
picture.  Despite Jackson's next project being "King Kong" (no,
really) his work will be looked forward to with some
anticipation.  [***/interesting] and summer bays at the beach on
the Sid and Nancy scale.
------
paul-michael agapow (agapow@latcs1.oz.au), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse
[archived at http://www.cs.latrobe.edu.au/~agapow/Postviews]

Title
Review for eXistenZ (1999)
It is the near future.  Allegra Gellar (Lewis) is the world's
greatest designer of virtual reality games.  During a playtest of
her masterpiece "eXistenZ", a botched assassination takes place. 
Unable to trust anyone, she flees with a makeshift bodyguard Ted
Pikul (Law).  Attempting to retrieve the only copy of her damaged
game, Allegra and Pikul enter the scenario as the divisions
between game and reality blur.
In order not to spoil the film, this review must by necessity be
brief and somewhat elliptical.
"eXistenZ" (pronounced ex-is-TENZ, as in existential) divides me
like few films have before.  On one hand there are some nice
twists and turns in it.  On the other the blurring of dream and
reality (be it actual dreams, virtual reality or hallucinations)
has been done similarly many times before.  (To name but a few
examples: "The Game", "Brazil", "The Stuntman", "Naked Lunch".) 
On one hand, "eXistenZ" is sometimes very funny and lively.  On
the other it contains some horrible acting and implausible plot. 
It's a movie I enjoy more in retrospect than in actually seeing
it.
It is the first half-hour of this film that will probably make or
break the viewer's opinion.  The actors drag themselves lumpishly
through the preliminaries to establish the plot.  Lewis, taking a
break from playing nyphomaniac imbeciles, mumbles an explaination
of why her game is so good.  Law sports a North American accent
so phony and an expression so wooden that he seems to have
wandered in from the set of "Night of the Living Dead".  Soon
they are on the run and Law is whining, "I Want To Know What is
Going On", capital letters and all.  But then he confesses, "I
have a fear of having my body penetrated surgically".  And only
in a Cronenberg film would you find anyone with a phobia so
specific.  Probably because he watched "Dead Ringers", poor
fellow.  But then Willem Dafoe shows up, playing a man (uh) a man
with bad teeth, who gives the Law the surgical penetration he's
been looking for.
Then we are introduced to the actual game and about now things
start to get interesting.  Players "plug in" by inserting fleshy
cables into "bioports", cavities in their spine.  Naturally,
sticking the jack into your bioport is a metaphor for sex.  But
this is a Cronenberg film and everything is a metaphor for sex. 
Except for sex itself, which is a metaphor for death.
The game play will give any veteran roleplayer or text adventure
addict a few laughs.  Our protagonists are lead by the nose
through a ridiculous plot, forced into certain actions, and at
one point struggle to extract information from a dopey non-player
character.  (This evoked strong memories of typing, "examine
item, get item, pickup item, retrieve item, grab item," to get
the reply, "You can't do that.")
The plot of the movie itself is mysterious and defies any
consistent explanation.  There is a viewpoint that allows one to
explain away the hideous acting and loo pholes as intentional
artifacts of the director.  But the acting is still poor and the
plot still nonsensical.  But if you can get by that (and it's a
big if), "eXistenZ" will provide a few amusing gags and twists
and probably leave a grin on your face.  [***/good] and a good
party you don't remember most of on the Sid and Nancy scale.
--
Paul-Michael Agapow (p.agapow@ic.ac.uk), Biology, Imperial College
"We were too young, we lived too fast and had too much technology ..."

Title
Review for Unforgettable (1996)
David Krane (Liotta) is a police medical examiner, accused of the
murder of his wife.  Although acquitted, the memory continues to
haunt him as he wonders why his wife was killed.  One day at a
crime scene he uncovers signs that his wife's killer is in the
area.  Serendipitously, he later attends a talk by researcher
Briggs (Fiorentino), who has managed to transfer memories between
rats ...
Another John Dahl and Linda Fiorentino film? After the
masterful and assured noir of "The Last Seduction", such an
effort would have to be (to use a tired phrase) compulsory
viewing.  But "Unforgettable" crept into the cinemas and slunk
away a few weeks later to mediocre reviews.  This is less than it
deserves - while it has its problems, it has a lot of good things
to offer too.
The SFnal device that drives "Unforgettable" is patently
absurd, especially to anyone who has done any amount of
neurophysiology.  The memory transfer procedure involves
intravenous injection of the cerebrospinal fluid of the "donor",
coupled with a cocktail of random drugs (the names seemingly
lifted from a first-year physiology textbook).  But the manner
and implication of the process is handled with some verve and
imagination.  The transfer emphasises vivid, shocking memories
and requires exposure to a cue for the original memory - such as
the scene of a murder, the face of someone involved.  The
memories are not simple knowledge but a re-experience, complete
with the original trauma and fear.  As Krane tries to unlock his
wife's murder, he accumulates a head of memories that clash and
merge unpredictably, his body suffering from the side-effects of
the transfer procedure and the accumulated psychic shock.
This intriguing setup is let down to some extent by the
plotting and acting.  Although Dahl has competently used
coincidence and cliche in the past (as in the absurd but
delightful "Red Rock West"), the strain shows as "Unforgettable"
winds down every 30 minutes before being kickstarted to life by a
fresh flurry of machinations and improbabilities.  As the climax
arrives, it also begins to lose its originality and confidence.
A mark of this is when the identity of Krane's mysterious nemesis
is questioned.  Anyone who has seen a film in the last ten years
will instantly finger the two unnecessary characters as
candidates, only leaving the question of whether it is the
blatantly obvious one or the equally blatant unobvious one.  It
is no mark of quality that both seem probable.
Peter Coyote turns in a good if minor performance as a glum
cop friend.  Liotta, never a great actor, does a good turn as the
slowly disintegrating and obsessed Krane.  As for Linda
Fiorentino ...
Despite these faults, "Unforgettable" is a good film even if
it is more a competent mystery than it is the clever treatise
that it might be.  [***/interesting] and Woody Allen films on the
Sid and Nancy scale.
------
paul-michael agapow (agapow@latcs1.oz.au), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse
[archived at http://www.cs.latrobe.edu.au/~agapow/Postviews/]

Title
Review for Postman, The (1997)
Once again, Kevin Costner spends far too much time, money and
seriousness on a slim tale. He plays an itinerant actor who reluctantly
becomes a symbol of freedom. But then, everyone thinks they're an actor
in this film.
"The Postman" (or, as it is called on the arthouse circuit, "Ill
Postino") was a project with "deadmeat" engraved across its forehead
even before it left the studio. A po-faced film of epic intent, helmed
by an actor everyone seems to love to hate, it is a worthy successor to
"Waterworld". But is it really as bad as all that? Sort of.
This is how it is. Kevin Costner is a scavenger, wandering the deserts
of a post-comfy era. And not for the last time, you think about how far
we have fallen where a world-famous actor is called "Kevin". But anyway,
the Kevster finds an abandoned garage and lounges there for a while,
talking to himself. "Things I like about my ass," he muses. But he's not
talking about the famed Costner tush (which obviously was holding out
for a more challenging role) but the mule that is our hero's only
friend.
Kev drags his ass down to a local town. It is revealed that he earns his
living moving from grungy town set to grungy town set, doing Shakespeare
for the locals. (Of course, there's only one of him, so he has to stick
his ass on stage.) But just after Kev has finished acting with his ass,
the bad guys ride into town for a bit of casual terrorism and extortion.
Kev tries to sneak his ass out of town, but the army spots his ass.
Conscripted into the army, Kev is imprisoned and can only stare
longingly at his ass.  He suffers as the army whips his ass. If only he
could get free, he could save his ass. Then the sadistic army commander
serves the recruits mule for supper. And so it is that everyone gets to
have a piece of Kevin's ass. Enraged, Kev escapes and wanders into the
desolate badlands. Travel is slow, for he has no ass.
The opportunity for ass jokes having passed, the movie gets a lot duller
after this point. And the story hasn't even started, with the hour mark
looming on the horizon and as yet no mention of the eponymous postal
employee. Actually, when the original David Brin story was written,
perhaps postmen could be regarded as symbols of a smoothly running and
civil society. Today of course, they represent something different - ill
controlled homicidal rage and the need for tighter gun control. So who
better to take back a country from its oppressors?
Suffice it to say, Kev-baby eventually dons the uniform of a dead postie
and thus bluffs his way into a suspicious independent settlement. There
he is greeted as a symbol of hope and incidentally gets to have a medium
level sex scene. The remainder of the picture (and there's an awfully
big remainder) concerns how this brings hope back to the people of the
USA, while simultaneously sapping it from the audience. It's not
unwatchable, but it is the sort of film you follow out of the corner of
your eye while reading mail, doing the dishes, playing pinochle or - in
fact - doing anything else.
I'm now going to attempt to rescue some message from this mess. "The
Postman" is awful but it is certainly not much worse than a lot of films
that do respectable box-office. It has a strong female lead, an
ambiguous hero and the central story is small enough and cute enough to
make a good film. So how did it go wrong, and why is it so reviled? I
can only shrug. Maybe someone should have stepped in over the complaints
of the auteurs and said "enough is enough." (Certainly that would have
had a positive effect on the recent output of George Lucas and James
Cameron.) Maybe the critics fed off each and condemned the picture
without a chance. (As happened with "Heavens Gate".) Perhaps the process
of making a Hollywood film is essentially stochastic, more a series of
accidents than good judgement.
I can only shrug again. [*/misfire] and revision for undergraduate
economics on the Sid & Nancy scale.

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
A giant mutant lizard attacks New York.  As if.
Yes, your honour.  I'm representing the producers in the case of "The 
State versus Godzilla".  And might I add what a pleasure it is to 
appear before you again, ma'am.  Yes, it has been a long time - the 
Christopher Lambert deposition if I'm not mistaken.  But may I be so 
bold as to ask you to throw this case out?  My clients, Mssrs Emmerich 
and Devlin, are highly respected auteurs.  It is beneath the creators 
of "Independence Day" to be placed on trial like this ...
Yes ma'am, and "Stargate" and "Universal Soldier".  However ...  
Yes, and "Moon 44".  With Michael Pare.  But that was never bought to 
trial.
In any event, my clients plead not guilty to the charges of reckless 
lack of imagination and perverse negligence of plot.  We won't be 
dealing with the charges of acting crimes against humanity as the 
prosecution has referred these to the International Court in the 
Hague.
If I might turn to the first charge.  Irrespective of whether 
the witness has seen "King Kong" or "The Lost World", or "Alien", 
"Godzilla" is completely different.  Godzilla is not a giant ape 
running amok in New York, a T-Rex running amok in California, or 
indeed an alien running amok on a colony world, spaceship or earth.  
No, Godzilla is a giant lizard running amok in New York.  This is 
totally different.  As regards the second charge, in the prehearing 
the plot was ruled to be purely hearsay and inadmissible.
No, your honour.  "Inadmissible", not "invisible".  Yes ma'am, I 
suppose one interpretation is that a special effects film should be 
special.
Move to strike.  According to "The People versus Starship Troopers", a 
director cannot be held wholly responsible for the performances within 
his or her film.  In any event, I have Mssrs Broderick and Reno 
outside, waiting to be called.  Ms ... uh ... the lead actress 
wasn't available for this hearing.
Actually your honour, we weren't able to locate Ms ... uh ... the 
actress playing the reporter.  We've interviewed moviegoers widely and 
none of them can identify her or what she was doing in the movie.  The 
local police department have deployed stakeouts in several theatres in 
an effort to catch her on film.  We've also enlisted CSICOP, who have 
set up infra-red cameras in several venues.  They apparently believe 
she's just a misidentification of the planet Venus, or maybe swamp gas.
I object!  There is no way the witness could know that the producers 
were "creatively bankrupt bimbos who think that throwing money at a 
piece of broccoli would make it a hit".  The prosecution is asking the 
witness to speculate on the internal state of my clients.  Also, it is 
clearly demonstrated in the scene where the army realises they've lost 
Godzilla that ...
Lost, your honour. In Manhattan, yes.
We throw ourselves on the court's mercy.
While I wrote off "Independence Day" as a B-grade movie that had been 
given a blockbuster gloss, "Godzilla" is not even graced by being 
gloriously bad or cheesy.  It is just dull, an empty trotting out of 
the essentials of the Godzilla myth, poorly masked by much sound and 
fury, signifying little but a gnawing black hole at the heart of the 
film.  The filmmakers were apparently unaware that any effort had to 
be expended on wooing the audience - to them, the sight of Godzilla 
crushing pedestrians should be thrilling in of itself, without any 
effort at suspense, empathy or surprise.  With luck, this may convince 
Devlin and Emmerich (and Hollywood at large) that no amount of 
advertising fervour will make a hit out of poorly acted, lazily plotted 
garbage.  [*/misfire] and meatloaf surrounded by fireworks on the Sid 
and Nancy scale.
"Godzilla"
Released 1998.
Directed by Roland Emmerich.
Produced by Dean Devlin, Roland Emmerich  et al.
Starring Matthew Broderick, Jean Reno, Maria Pitillo, Hank Azaria,
        Kevin Dunn, Michael Lerner, Harry Shearer.
--
Paul-Michael Agapow (agapow@latcs1.oz.au)
Postviews SF/F reviews site: 

Title
Review for Strange Days (1995)
It is the last day of 1999 in a Los Angeles teetering on the
brink of civil war.  Lenny (Fiennes) is a ex-cop gone to seed and
pedalling "clips" --- full sensory experiences recorded on and
played back from disk.  As the year 2000 approaches and Lenny
hustles, he finds himself threatened by unknown forces somehow
connected with his ex-girlfriend, musician Faith (Lewis).  Aided
by bodyguard/driver Mace (Bassett) and scuzzy plainclothes cop
Max (Sizemore), he trys to solve the mystery.
The vilification that "Strange Days" was subjected to by
critics is difficult to explain.  It is not a film without
problems, but it still packs a mighty punch and its recent
release of video gives hope that this tough and dense film might
find its audience.
Possibly critics were primed by names on the production
staff.  Although Bigelow is widely regarded as a very talented
director, she has produced some astoundingly bad movies.
(Examples : the silly "Blue Steel" and the even sillier "Point
Break".)  SF-movie guru Cameron as producer and writer raises
other problems.  As a science-fiction film-maker, he makes good
action films.  "Aliens" and "Terminator 2" are, at their heart,
action films with SF elements being largely replaceable or
extraneous to the plot.  Strangely enough both Bigelow and
Cameron emerge out with flying colours.  Although some motifs are
purloined from other films (notably "Bladerunner", "T2" and "City
of Lost Children"), Bigelow's direction is inventive and deft,
capturing a millennial LA in a bright staccato stream of images.
Even on video this wall of images and sound is overwhelming, like
the city careering towards a new age.  Cameron's script is
intermittently clever.  It is perhaps arguable whether the SF
elements are irreplaceable but the story itself is comfortable
with them and exploits them, confirming its SF nature.
Thankfully it also avoids being the stream of wisecracks and
stunts that passes for many scripts nowadays.
Acting is generally of a high standard.  Bassett is fabulous
as the hardened Mace, and Fiennes is great as the charming but
decaying Lenny.  If anyone was looking to cast a William Gibson's
"Neuromancer", these two _are_ Molly Millions and Case.
There are also some painful issues dealt with in "Strange
Days", not all immediately apparent.  Is a race or class war
necessary to solve inequality?  Do lives have to be sacrificed to
save the living?  (There are two answers to that, one which we
would want to be true and one we fear is true.)  Images and the
media are pervasive and untrustworthy.  Lenny's flashbacks look
like movies.  He treats clips of Faith as memories rather than
symbols of memories.  Images are constantly seen in reflections
and mirrors, pictures that look the same but are reversed.
Conversely, there are some problems.  The film suffers from
"Cameron bloat": the inability to tell a film in a reasonable
amount of time.  (See "Abyss" et al.)  The first hour of the film
is busy rather than complex, failing to really start the story
until halfway.  The subplot concerning Faith (Juliette Lewis
playing the same characters she does in everything these days) is
fairly tenuously connected to the rest of the movie.  The
eventual logic of the plot and character motivation is fairly
suspect too, although to be fair this is apparent largely in
hindsight.  Also puzzling is the film's ambivalent attitude to
the LAPD, perhaps a reflection of everyone's ambivalence to law
enforcement.  This can be seen in a central event in the film, a
re-enactment of the Rodney King beating, and how it differs from
its realworld analog in circumstance and eventual resolution.
Also a few small cliches and stupidities show up in the climax
literally in the last ten minutes, but this and the previous
point cannot be discussed further without spoilers.
Nonetheless, "Strange Days" is recommended strongly as a
ambitious and successful SF piece.  Hopefully in years to come it
will achieve greater recognition.  For those concerned by such
things, it contains significant amounts of sex, nudity and
disturbing (but not graphic) violence.  [****/mustsee] and dive
bombing on the Sid and Nancy scale.
------
paul-michael agapow (agapow@latcs1.oz.au), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse
[archived at http://www.cs.latrobe.edu.au/~agapow/Postviews/]

Title
Review for Fifth Element, The (1997)
It is 250 years in the future.  Dallas (Willis), an ex-soldier,
drives taxis in the swarming metropolis of New York.  One day a
orange-haired nymphet Leeloo (Jovovich) speaking an unknown
language crash-lands in his taxi.  Soon she is doing the "speed
learn from an encyclopedia" shtick and with the help of a priest
(Holm, and by the look of his acolyte's headgear his religion
must worship of early 80s rock bands) we find out the universe is
doomed.  Unless, of course, four widgets are obtained from a
remote location and assembled in a Dungeons and Dragons puzzle
room, against the wishes of the evil businessman Zorg (Oldman)
and a group of unexplained shape-changing aliens.
Did that sound silly?  You have no idea ...  There are several
types of logical blunders in fiction.  In "The Fifth Element" the
first type betrays perhaps nothing more than carelessness on
director Besson's part: black holes mentioned in 1914,
temperatures of -5000 C, a (apparently) three hour flight during
which the passengers cryosleep to avert boredom, a planet "in the
constellation of ...".  Stupid, but the plot does not in any way
depend on these points - they are at most distracting.  You
shouldn't get too upset about such trivia.  A second might be the
absurd fact that once accepted allows the rest of the story
to proceed - a flying, invulnerable superhero; a rapid growing,
parasitic alien that can lay eggs in any humanoid; or (in this
case) the assembly of four artifacts to save the universe.
But "The Fifth Element" abounds with another type of mistake,
in the logic that leads the story from one point to another.
Although the moment to moment action is straightforward and the
plot is essentially simple, upon analysis it is completely
nonsensical.  The President, the fate of the entire universe at
stake mind you, orders a low-key one-man mission.  Leeloo is
surprised and shattered by the human concept of war, forgetting
that her race has spent eons fighting genocidal forces intent on
obliterating all life, that her ship was destroyed by hostile
forces, and that she has been karate-chopping and waving guns
about for the past hour.  Zorg's motives are murky and his
controller totally unexplained.  Several times the plot powers
itself out of dead-ends using "with one mighty leap he was free!"
logic.  Possibly there is a lot of footage on the cutting room
floor, possibly a lot of explanatory material was excised from
the script.  Or maybe the film is just plain dumb.
The cast is crowded with superfluous characters and execrable
acting.  Gary Oldman, sounding like a cross between Gomer Pyle
and Anthony Robbins, falls into both categories.  On the bright
side Willis does well, albeit as a caricature, while Jovovich is
surprisingly good even when required to utter stupid lines.  (The
more English she speaks, the less convincing her character
becomes.)  Mention should also be made of Luke "don't blink or
you'll miss me" Perry, who deserves bigger roles, and a bizarre
cameo as a mugger by Matthieu Kassovitz (director of "La Haine"
and star of "Un Heros Tres Discret").
And despite the above problems, the film is fairly enjoyable.
Besson has always favoured (and got away with) feel over logic
and look over plot.  For example, his "Subway" and "La Femme
Nikita" are fun despite also being plainly ridiculous.  But more
recently, with "Leon the Professional" he showed a masterful
handling of script, direction and character with more lucid and
intense plotting.  "The Fifth Element" is big step back to his
earlier work, a big, dumb but likeable film.  The whole is absurd
but the parts are quite good: a bioengineered opera diva,
residential blocks designed for police lockdown, the dizzying
heights of New York protruding from a smoggy abandoned surface,
cigarettes that are 75% filter.  In a way the correct film to
compare it to would be "Bladerunner", not for the narrative but
for the vision of a brash, busy and colourful future - a
three-way collision between Ridley Scott, Doc EE Smith and
Jean-Paul Gaultier.  It also helps that the central conflict is
at once broad (good vs.  evil) and very personal (Dallas fighting
for Leeloo), largely avoiding machismo and flag-waving.
It grieves me to recommend a picture to "switch your mind
off" at.  But unlike other big dumb pictures (like most anything
coming out of the Hollywood system), "The Fifth Element" is a
little different, more colourful, more exciting and less
offensive.  If you're going to take your mind candy, it may as
well taste good.  Unfortunately this film will probably not come
across well on video due to the diminishing of the visuals.
[**/ok] and on the Sid and Nancy scale.
"The Fifth Element"
Directed by Luc Besson.
Starring Bruce Willis, Milla Jovovich, Ian Holm, Gary Oldman,
Brion James, Luke Perry, Tom "Tiny" Lister Jr, Matthieu Kassovitz.
Released 1997.
------
paul-michael agapow (agapow@latcs1.oz.au), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse
[archived at http://www.cs.latrobe.edu.au/~agapow/Postviews/]

Title
Review for 12:01 (1993) (TV)
A well-meaning but bumbling clerk (Silverman) takes a shine to
one of the scientists (Slater) at his workplace but she is gunned
down in front of him.  Mysteriously, that night he is flung back
in time to replay this day endlessly.  He investigates a sinister
experiment at the heart of both the murder and his time travel.
Previously, this Richard Lupoff story was filmed as a terrific
and much blacker short feature, also called "12:01" (1990) and
starring the wonderful Kurtwood "can you fly Bobby?"  Smith.
(Highly recommended, if you can get your hands on it.)  It also
bears a close resemblance to "Groundhog Day", of which it has
been called the flipside (cv Leonard Maltin).  As the two were
released in the same year, it's difficult to see how much
influence there could have been.  But "12:01" (1993) seems to
have snipped out the noir and nihilism of "12:01" (1990) and
substituted the romanticism of "Groundhog Day" without the
morality tale aspects.
"12:01" (1993, that's this one, okay?)  lumbers itself with
enough liabilities it's a wonder it ever recovers.  Jonathan
Silverman (remember?  "Weekend at Bernies"?  1 and 2?)  attempts
to scrap up enough charisma before the bank forecloses on his
acting career.  Helen Slater ("Supergirl") wrestles with
blandness.  Martin Landau as the head of the research laboratory
is left to chew the scenery.  Add one murder plot, some
artificial urgency, a sprinkle of dumb coincidence and allow to
simmer.  Serve lukewarm.
But while "12:01" never quite lives up to its predecessor, it
manages some competence of its own.  There is a consistent logic
behind the time loop and Silverman's slow realisation of what is
going on and his subsequent reaction are scripted with some care.
(Some care.  Some dumbness and also some care.)  A modicum of
pacing and a lack of the saccharine that (for me) ruined
"Groundhog Day" helps make what could have been a disaster into a
minor but diverting story.
Wonderful it ain't, but it passes muster.  [**/ok] and one of
the better episodes of "Space 1999" on the Sid and Nancy scale.
------
paul-michael agapow (agapow@latcs1.oz.au), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse
"There is no adventure, there is no romance, there is only trouble and desire."
[archived at http://www.cs.latrobe.edu.au/~agapow/Postviews/]

Title
Review for Mars (1996) (V)
On corporate dominated Mars, the all useful fuel "silax" is mined
for a huge profit.  But a Keeper - one of the company policeman -
has been murdered in circumstances that suggest his corruption.
His brother and fellow Keeper, the strangely expressionless
Caution (!)  Templar (played by the strangely expressionless
Gruner) travels to Mars to kickbox the baddies into a confession.
You might think that there aren't many SF/F films made.  A
trip to the video store belies this, with numerous titles
slipping unannounced onto the shelves.  Surely, one of these must
be a hidden gem?
Uh, no.  A lot of good films go straight to video, but some
scaling law seems to ensure that any SF/F bound on that route is
at best mediocre, at worst stygian.  Why pick "Mars"?  Well,
Gruner is the martial artist who played the lead in "Nemesis".
As terrible as that picture was, Gruner showed some promise.  His
acting was subdued but better than wooden with some flair for
action.  In time he might evolve past Jean Claude van Damme in
the SF-action roles.
But not in this role.  Hampered by a lobotomised script, a
poor supporting cast, tepid direction and his own underacting,
Gruner is throwing his career into full reverse.  (And strangely,
while in "Nemesis" he used his own voice, here he seems to be
dubbed by someone else.)  "Mars" is not even gloriously bad or
overly-ambitious, it merely inspires indifference.
Strike one against it, is that while the script shows signs of
a bigger project, the grander themes have been roughly edited
out, sometimes leaving dangling threads.  (The Keepers are
apparently a quasi-religious order with its own agenda.  The
Templars have some old family conflict.  But these ideas don't
lead anywhere.)  Strike two is the sheer laziness of the story
telling.  Throw in a sympathetic female doctor, a scuzzy thief, a
smooth corporate apparatchik and in Hollywood shorthand (with no
development or surprises) you know they will become the feisty
love interest, the comic sidekick and the cold-blooded enemy.  We
learn of a horrific plague affecting the miners by Caution
walking past a quarantine room full of victims with huge oozing
sores, retching blood.  Scenes in the Martian Domes appear to
have been filmed in a hospital basement.
Even these problems could be overcome by some competent
direction.  But (Strike three!  You're out!)  some scenes are
constructed in such a way as to make them hard to follow.  In
fights it is difficult to know who is where and doing what.  At
times Caution wanders around, seemingly so (a la James Bond) the
baddies can attack him and reveal part of the plot to him.  It's
difficult to develop much feeling for a film that does so little
to hook you in.
Possibly worth looking at, if you're stuck on an airflight
with no reading material.  [**/ok] and early morning TV on the
Sid and Nancy scale.
------
paul-michael agapow (agapow@latcs1.oz.au), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse
"There is no adventure, there is no romance, there is only trouble and desire."
[archived at http://www.cs.latrobe.edu.au/~agapow/Postviews/]

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
Trinity, an outlaw, attempts to evade capture by a group of mysterious
darksuited agents, a chase that involves progressively more implausible
stunts.  Meanwhile Neo, a hacker who is searching the network for an
enigmatic figure called Morpheus, is warned of his impending arrest.
Things get more complicated from this point on ...
"It's like totally virtual reality dude!"
It seems unlikely that an overdue entry to the big idea SF genre would
involve Keanu Reeves, who is still wanted in 20 countries for crimes
committed during "Bram Stoker's Dracula" and the wretched "Johnny
Mnemonic".  But even given the presence of the gnarly one, "The Matrix" has
a promising pedigree, including the Wachowski brothers (former comic book
artists who contributed the deft script to "Assassins" and directed the
excellent film-noir "Bound") and a top notch Hong Kong stunt & action
choreography crew.  It's a winner alright but what sort of one?  As is
always the case with movies that contain twists, this review must talk
around the surprises and be somewhat cryptic and brief.
Many others have sung the praises of "The Matrix" and I am not inclined to
disagree in any major way.  There's some kinetically absurd action that Jet
Li or John Woo would be proud of, some handy plot twists and turns, lovely
SFX, and good acting.  (With the exception of Keanu "cigarstore indian"
Reeves, who at least doesn't hurt the film.  Actually his essential
blandness is strangely appropriate.)  There's a literate substructure, a
nice joke or two, snappy clothes and hardware - there's a lot to love.  And
the film carves its own path in many ways.  Some plot developments are
never explicitly spelt out and the scenario is an uncommonly nihilistic one
for a Hollywood film.  And to partly repeat a previous point, Hong Kong
acrobatics are long overdue in mainstream cinema.  "The Matrix" is _the_
popcorn, brain-filler movie for the season.
Is there anything wrong with "The Matrix"?  Although you wouldn't think it
from general reactions, there is.  It's terrific fun, but falls short of
the film it nearly is.  The intellectual content isn't so much explored as
just dumped in front of you.  It doesn't have the mazelike complexities of
"Bladerunner" or even for that matter "Total Recall".  The implications of
the scenario are never explored, which is possibly just as well, for like
many comic books worlds it doesn't hold up to much examination.  The
inevitable talk of a sequel points how high on detail and low on
implication the world is.
Conversely, one might get the impression from promotional material that
"The Matrix" was a nonstop actionfest.  Actually the first half is packed
to the gunwales with talking heads and exposition.  It's to the credit of
the Wachowski brothers that "The Matrix" survives and thrives on this
schizophrenic nature, managing to be both a dumb action flick and a
thinker.  Again, Keanu is oddly appropriate, having been in both "Speed"
and "Little Buddha".  His character is actually problematic, a saviour who
is never explained, does nothing to earn his superiority, and conveniently
gets his act together just in time to end the film.  In this way, "The
Matrix" echoes "Dark City", a film to which it bears an uncanny
resemblance.
These problems aside, "The Matrix" is terrific and a hopeful sign that some
classic SF may be on the way over the next few years.  It isn't a great
film, it isn't a mindblower, but it is great fun.  Don't miss it.
[***/good] and really partying like it was 1999 on the Sid and Nancy
 scale.
"The Matrix"
Released 1999.
Directed by Andy & Larry Wachowski.
Starring Keanu Reeves, Laurence Fishburne, Carrie-Anne Moss, Hugo Weaving
--
Paul-Michael Agapow (p.agapow@ic.ac.uk), Biology, Imperial College
"We were too young, we lived too fast and had too much technology ..."

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
An even longer time ago in a galaxy far, far away ...
Imagine a world different to ours.  Imagine a world where in the mid
90s George Lucas falls on hard times.  Desperate for money, he is
approached by a shadowy corporation.  The rights to "Star Wars" change
hands.  From their sweaty, crowded offices (based in a remote tropical
country for tax and legal conveniences), the new owners hatch their
plans for a quick buck.  Using evidence carefully accumulated over the
years (photos of adolesents, movies on no-one's resume), several A-list
actors are blackmailed into cooperating.  The cast is completed by
extras who are willing to pay to get into the film.  Large quantities
of special effects are ordered and shoehorned into the film, primarily
to cover up for the sullen acting.  Those who refuse to cooperate are
tranquilized and lead through their scenes.  The production takes a
single month.  Direction is done by members of the local cinema club,
editing by the corporate accountant.  Journalists are leant on,
critics bribed, fan groups lead along.  Anyone who asks for a
merchandising license is given one.  The whole world eagerly awaits
"The Fandom Menace".
A question: could this film be distinguished from the one that was
released in our world?
The original "Star Wars" trilogy is a flimsy hero for all the
monuments that have been built to it.  The storyline is thin, the
acting only passable, the direction competent, the universe simplistic
(and, "Chasing Amy" jokes aside, astoundingly white Anglo-saxon).  It
contains nothing that has not been done before in SF/F. But that's
largely the point: if you're going to make a dumb swashbuckling space
opera, it had better swash and buckle.  For better or worse, that is
what the original trilogy did.  The passion of the most fanatic "Star
Wars" fans is inexplicable, but it is a durable piece of escapist
entertainment.
And then we come to "The Phantom Menace", which is not a terrible
film, but is terribly disappointing, banal and disjointed even by the
subterranean standards of fandom.  A movie only a marketer could love,
its central problem is simple: it is badly made.  The acting tanks,
the dialogue is terrible, the script (there is no other word for it)
sucks.  It is disorganised and careless, a dumb film trying to be
meaningful, an adult film unable to explain itself, a child's film that
is pretentious.
The plot is best left untold, lest the malevolent demons that had
apparently possessed the script-writers during production are invoked. 
At best it's pedestrian (about a tax dispute!)  and sprints from scene
to scene with hurried explanations.  At worst it becomes deliriously
stupid, a few gems being:
   * Anakin building, in his spare time from bits and pieces, the
   fastest podracer on Tatooine which he races and wins in, untested.
   * A sub-Duchovnian explaination for the Force, which sounds like an
   amalgam of the ideas that L Ron Hubbard and Wilhelm Reich rejected.
   * The virgin birth of Anakin, which is either a gobsmackingly wide
   Christ metaphor (which makes no sense) or a desperately lateral
   attempt to avoid mentioning sex and so get that family rating
   certificate.  (Actually I don't think anyone in the Star Wars
   universe has sex - the only person we meet who ever has is Darth
   and he's batting for the other side.  Which is to say, he's a
   figure of ultimate evil.  Go figure.)
   * Jar Jar Binks, a cringing Uncle Tom figure with an impenetrable
   accent who walks like he has a specific gravity less than cotton
   candy.  Even during the somber scenes, he's dancing about in the
   background doing pratfalls.  This demonstrates how advanced the
   "Star Wars' universe is: Instead of prejudice towards non-white,
   non-male humans (not that there are very many in "The Phantom
   Menace"), there is prejudice towards aliens.
Even those in the cast who usually turn in strong performances
(Neeson, McGregor, Portman) are terrible.  The suppporting cast is
hideous, especially the utterly resistable Jake Lloyd as Anakin
Skywalker.  (Or "Ani", as it's pronounced in Tatooine mallspeak.) 
With lines like "Yippee!"  and "But Mom, didn't you tell me the
problem with the universe is that noone wants to get involved?", I
don't wonder the Jedi don't want to train him.  He'd spend every
morning at Jedi High getting his head flushed in the toilet by other
students.
However, the worse thing about "The Phantom Menace" is its lack of
imagination, Lucas literally self-cannibalising from the original
trilogy: Anakin (Luke) flying in and destroying the robot control
station (death star) with the help of R2D2, the Gungan natives (Ewoks)
fighting a delaying battle as the Jedi try to shut down a vital
installation; the death of the old Jedi and passing of the flame to
the new Jedi.  Pop has not only eaten itself, it is smacking its lips
and clammering for dessert.  So eager is the director to connect to
the original story that it becomes almost autoerotic as old characters
are rushed by the camera: R2D2, C3P0, Jabba, Greedo, Yoda.  Even
Obiwan doesn't have any real reason to be in this film.  He spends
most of the film looking worried and doing the Jedi equivalent of
pumping his fist and shouting "Yeah - what he said!"
Is there anything good about "The Phantom Menace"?  Some of the sets
are impressive, for the scant seconds we see them.  Some action scenes
like the podrace and lightsaber fights come to colorful life,
unspoiled by brain-damaged dialogue.  It is interesting to note that
these scenes would have been under the control of the SFX director and
action choreographer.
How come "The Phantom Menace" is bad?  How did the most anticipated
and tightly controlled movie of all times get to be so bad?  For many,
the villian of choice is creator Lucas, guilty of fathering the
"blockbuster movie", the dumb, hyper-merchandised and rigidly
formulaic films that pollute our screens each year.  This accusation
seems hollow to me.  The marketing of any of the original "Star Wars"
trilogy comes nowhere near that as is now routinely practiced.  Even
if there is a direct causal chain from the "Star Wars" to
"Independence Day" and "Wild Wild West", it couldn't have been
foreseen.  The vast bounty that Lucas has made from Star Wars is as
much a historical accident as anything.  Conversely, it's difficult to
blame the makers of the over-hyped films that followed, the Emmerichs,
the Spielbergs, the Sonnefelds.  When the success of a movie is so
ruthlessly bent to marketing, can they be blamed for saying "I want
some of that?"
Similarly, it's very easy to accuse Lucas of just milking the public
for squillions of dollars.  No doubt he will do well out of TPM, and
certainly the hype and control exercised by him were extraordinary. 
But this falls far short of evidence for avarice on his part.  (And
realistically, just how much more money could he use?)  No, I think
Lucas is sincere and the juggernaut way he controls his creation is
just a mark of how much he cares about his product, how much he wants
to enthral people, to create a phenomena.
And he doesn't have the skill.  The lumbering script is evidence of
that.  The cannibalisation of everything he has seen, including his
own movies, is evidence of that.  The incoherent, leaden direction is
evidence of that.  Lucas is the reason "The Phantom Menace" is bad,
but this can't explain how it was allowed to become bad.
The culprits, I fear, are us, the audience.  We've allowed ourselves
to be fired-up by publicity, to be dragged along to see a "Star Wars"
film, no matter what it is.  We'll go and see a lousy movie, just so
we're not left out of loop of conversation.  This is why marketing is
everything and quality is nothing.  Ask yourself just how bad "the
Pahntom Menace" would have to be before you wouldn't see.  People
could be dropping dead in the aisles or driven blind by the sheer
badness, and most of us would still say: "Well, the death rate is down
in recent sessions, so maybe we'll wait until the weekend ..."
"The Phantom Meance" is crap, but then that's what movies are now, and
always will be.  At least while we keep going to them.  It may be a
futile gesture, it's unlikely to make you any happier, but skip the
next blockbuster, skirt the next load of hype.  It's the only
solution.  [*/misfire] and "like a thousands voices had cried out" on
the Sid and Nancy scale.
--
Paul-Michael Agapow (p.agapow@ic.ac.uk), Biology, Imperial College
"We were too young, we lived too fast and had too much technology ..."

Title
Review for Demoni 2 (1986)
Astonishly bad Italian horror flick in which a demonic infection
spreads through the colourless inhabitants of an apartment block,
causing them to underact, accquire poorly dubbed "Epic Theatre"
voices and kill each other.
A definite "so bad it's good" movie, "Demons 2" is
reminiscent of Frankenstein.  The monster, not the movie that is,
because it looks like it was stitched together from the remains
of several dead productions and allowed to shamble about the
soundstage for an hour and a half.  Unfortunately "Demons 2" does
not kill its creator and then get lost in the Artic, but you
can't have everything.  Scarily enough, this effort may actually
have been assembled as a whole.
The prequel "Demons", for those who haven't seen it (and let's
face it, who has?)  concerns a film premiere at which the
audience are transformed one-by-one into demons and kill each
other.  For this sequel, the action takes place instead in a
(quelle surprise) condo.  Common characters?  None.  Plot
connections?  None?  Acting?  None.
You have to give the director (who is the sole common link)
some credit, because he has sucessfully shot a film in which no
character's name can be remembered.  Nada.  You end up referring
to them in elliptical ways.  ("What happened to the black guy who
looked like he was going to get eaten?"  "He got eaten."  "Oh.")
However, he does have a talent for surreal plot twists.  Ten
minutes into the film, a group of partgoers usher their nerdish
friend outside to deflect the crazy "Gerald" (maybe), who is
going to crash their party.
Cue nerd waiting on street corner.  Cue shots of Gerald
driving at high speeds through town, laughing maniacally.
("Gerald, you're going too fast!"  "Hahaha, I can handle it
baby!")  Cue first apartment dwelvers being torn apart by demons
...  Nerd waits on street corner, looks left and right.  Gerald
laughs.  The victims are trapped in the garage, ramming cars into
the closed exit doors.  Gerald shrugs off a request to slow down.
Nerd waits.  People get eaten.  Gerald speeds.  Repeat for next
80 minutes.
Finally, at the film's end, everyone is dead and the nerd is
still waiting.  He turns, gapes.  In a screech of rubber, Gerald
arrives, rolls and crashes his car and dies.  The end.  (Wipes
tear from eye.)  Ah, they don't make them like that anymore.
Hell, they're not allowed to.
Did I say that was the end?  Well, a man and a pregnant woman
do manage to escape into an empty TV studio (perhaps in hope of
starring in something else) and before you can say "Piero
Pasolino", they're re-enacting the birth of Christ.  It _is_ an
Italian film.  Guess the Romans are a little tense about mucking
up the last divine birth, so they want to be sure not to miss the
next one.
Hideous, but deliriously so.  [0/bomb] and rap accordion on
the Sid and Nancy scale.  3 Lamberts on the bad movie scale.
------
paul-michael agapow (agapow@latcs1.oz.au), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse
"There is no adventure, there is no romance, there is only trouble and desire."
[archived at http://www.cs.latrobe.edu.au/~agapow/Postviews/]

Title
Review for Independence Day (1996)
Plot synopsis: (are you trying to tell me you don't know?)  Slimy
and easily detestable aliens aliens come to Earth and kill a lot of
extras.  After the main characters have finish vacillating, they
kick alien butt.  Fin.
In case you're wondering, I was one of two people on the
planet who didn't see "In-duh-pendence Day" at the cinema in
1996.  The other was Xing!-Kao!, a Bushman who was lost in the
wilds of the Serengetti for most of the year.  Having just seen
the aforementioned film on laserdisc, and given it's about to
appear on video, and as Xing!  has just made his way back to
civilisation, it seems appropriate to reflect on the worth of
"In-duh-pendence Day".
To pre-empt myself with the verdict, "In-duh-pendence Day" is
nothing special.  It is not, as some have proclaimed, "the worst
movie ever made", nor is is quite worthy of the moniker "IQ4".
What it is, is a minor and humourless SF piece with delusions of
grandeur, hyped beyond all reason and lumbered with some very
unsubtle and nasty subtexts.
It's pointless to recount the many plot holes - other have
done so thoroughly.  But we are not just talking about outrageous
contrivances or coincidences (i.e.  after the attack the USA is
apparently only populated by a dozen characters who can't help
but trip over each other) or handwaving (i.e.  the famous
Mac-compatible alien mothership, obviously using AOCE), but
serious logical problems.  (What is powering the captured alien
scoutship at the end?  Why do the aliens need to broadcast a
countdown?  Don't they have clocks?  How does two characters
escape from a panicked New York and get to Washington in 6 hours?
The military are short on pilots for their aircraft, which goes
against all logic and evidence.)  The scriptwriters obviously did
not care or assumed the audience wouldn't.
It is also too simple to blame Roland Emmerich.  He is not a
great director but "Universal Soldier" and "Stargate" at least
have parts that work, even work well.  He is just plain out of
his depth here, trying to control this sprawling mess.  Neither
do the actors deliver: Mary McDonnell is the most chipper
terminally-ill person you've ever seen ("You're supposed to be
dying, stop smiling damnit!")  and Jeff Goldblum sleepwalks
through his role.  Two hours of Judd Hirsch and Randy Quaid
overacting their Jewish grandfather and Vietnam vet looney roles
respectively, suggests most strongly that they should have been
fired at the aliens in retaliation.  Special mention should be
made of Harry "no soul" Connick Jr, who normally makes a living
pretending to be a black musician and here pretends to be a black
fighter pilot.  Even the usually reliable Bill Pullman, as the
US President, looks distinctly uncomfortable.  His lips move,
sounding out a stirring speech.  What you actually hear is him
saying "Uh, bad alien!  Go away!".  When Brent Spiner appears in
a thankless cameo as a boffin, you have hopes that Jonathan
Frakes will show up in the role of the alien mothership.  Alas,
no.
No, the only people who really did their work for
"In-duh-pendence Day" were the marketing experts and the SFX
people and they do deserve a lot of credit.  Unfortunately, much
of the power of the special effects is lost on the small screen
but they are still passingly impressive.  Also effective are the
action scenes, which are at least noisy, energetic and colourful,
if too infrequent.
But most disturbing are several themes graunched into the
movie.  The most blatant of this is a clumsy pitch at American
patriotism, replete with constant images of flags waving and
national monuments.  At its extremes this becomes hilarious, with
a US flag on the stage curtain at a strip bar, booming theme
music that sounds like nothing so much as "Deutschland,
Deutschland, Uber Alles" and the combined military of the non-US
world sitting in the desert waiting for "the Americans" to give
directions.
More subtle but unmistakable is the constant reinforcement of
traditional sex roles.  Goldblum's prissy effeminate boss is
shown to be a mama's boy and a coward before being killed.  With
the menfolk rushing around and fighting aliens, the women are
left with little to do, asides from mind the children and look on
admiringly.  Those that have a man are reunited with them and
plight their troth.  Those that don't, die.  Goldblum's
eco-conscious SNAG is triumphantly transformed into a
cigar-chomping Real Man by the end, come back to claim his woman.
This, in my mind, is the most disturbing thing about
"In-duh-pendence Day".
At the end, one is left an impression of clumsiness. There are
certainly worse films, more illogical ones, worse scripted ones,
dumber ones.  But rolled into one long-winded parcel - that's
ID4.  [*/misfire] and a remake of "This Island Earth" on the Sid
and Nancy scale.
"Independence Day"
Directed by Roland Emmerich.
Starring Jeff Goldblum, Judd Hirsch, Randy Quaid, Bill Pullman,
   Will Smith, Mary McDonnell, Margret Colin, Vivica Fox, Brent Spiner,
   Robert Loggia, Harvey Fierstein, Harry Connick Jr.
Released 1996.
------
paul-michael agapow (agapow@latcs1.oz.au), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse

Title
Review for Men in Black (1997)
This year's "Independence Day", hyped to all hell and back
release: the Men in Black are shadowy agents who monitor alien
activity on Earth, suppressing evidence that would alert the
general public.  The laconic Kay (Jones) initiates a new agent
(Smith) while they chase a rouge alien, all three being in
pursuit of a plot macguffin.
Reviewing the latest Big Movie Event is a fraught task.  After
a deluge of publicity (so omnipresent that even hitherto
undiscovered tribes in the highlands of Myanmar can comment
fluently on Will Smith's witticisms), anyone with even the
slightest amount of cynicism would feel disappointment with the
actual product.  "Men in Black" doesn't measure up to its
pre-publicity, what movie could?  Like fashion, the movie
business has become disconnected with its end product and in now
largely about marketing the peripherals: the paraphernalia, the
licensing, the toys, the image.  More's the pity, because there
is actually a quirky and very sly picture hiding under the
curtain of hype.
The first clue that this is not the ultra-slick blockbuster
that is being marketed, is the spidery lettering of the opening
credit sequence.  A camera dizzily follows a mosquito bumbling
through a landscape of distorted, towering figures.  Director
Sonnenfeld is shooting from a point of view somewhere near Tim
"Edward Scissorhands" Burton, seeing a world turned at 90 degrees
to reality. (A comparison that is heightened by the Danny
Elfman score.)  In this way "Men in Black" is also reminiscent of
Sonnenfeld's previous "Addams Family" or "Get Shorty", in that we
see this weird world - blandly accepted by its inhabitants - and
its collision with the "real" world.
As Agent Kay, Tommy Lee Jones is thus this film's Gomez
Addams, completely unquestioning of his worldview.  Jones is
wonderfully hangdog, deadpanning throwaway lines as he shrugs off
body stealing, alien invasion and world destruction.  ("We're
self-funding through holding the patents on several bits of alien
technology we've acquired: microwave ovens, velcro,
liposuction.")  Will Smith, seemingly getting his acting
inspiration from "Shaft", is less interesting but at least does
not damage the picture.  Linda Fiorentino, as a curious medical
examiner, has some fun and is not wasted here as she was in
"Unforgettable".  Rip Torn contributes a minor but effective part
as the leader of the Men in Black.
Entertainment-wise, the first half of the film is rich on
laughs although of the surreal, dry type: Kay wrestles with a
foot-high alien as onlookers stare.  A group of agency initiates
struggle with a test while trapped in a room full of
dysfunctional 60s furniture.  There are no punchlines are per se,
it is the scenes that are funny.  Regrettably this attitude takes
a backseat as a conventional "find the magic widget" plot takes
over at about the halfway point.  This and some discrepancies
between the trailer and the film make me suspect that there was
some interference in the production.  Fortunately, "Men in Black"
does not outstay its welcome, tipping the scales at just over 1
and a half hours.
Not the blockbuster the studio might have wanted (and
perhaps that's best), "Men in Black" is cute, quirky and
recommended.  Knock down the rating some if you're become sick of
all the marketing.  [***/interesting] and Steve Reich on the TV
on the Sid and Nancy scale.
------
paul-michael agapow (agapow@latcs1.oz.au), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse
"There is no adventure, there is no romance, there is only trouble and desire."
[archived at http://www.cs.latrobe.edu.au/~agapow/Postviews/]

Title
Review for Lost World: Jurassic Park, The (1997)
Chaos mathematician Ian Malcolm (Goldblum), having had nothing to
do in "Jurassic Park", is given a second chance when his
girlfriend (Moore) is dispatched to another island of dinosaurs.
Going out there with the obligatory cute kid and lots of vehicles
that can be wrecked by rampaging dinos, they meet up with company
representatives on a rival mission.  After hearing their English
and South African accents, the dinosaurs eat the corporate goons
and later rampage through San Diego.  At that point there is no
more room left on the back of the Minties wrapper the plot was
written on, so the film ends.
If your brain is the size of a peanut and in your tail, have I
got a movie for you!
In case you haven't heard, "The Lost World" is distinctly 
ordinary.  "Jurassic Park" was no great shakes on the braincell 
scale, but at least it had some story, novel and rather wonderful 
special effects and some halfway decent action.  (Remember the 
raptors hunting the children in the kitchen?)  But "The Lost 
World" just hauls its surly carcass up onto the screen and slops 
out the warmed over leftovers of "Jurassic".  The writing is 
criminally stupid and derivative.  I found myself groaning aloud 
as I second-guessed every plot twist.  (And let me assure you 
that i mean _every_ plot twist.)  It is interesting that "The 
Lost World" does not bother to remind you of the previous film or 
explain anything again (assuming you remember JP well), but still 
expects you to be amazed by serving up exactly the same dish.  
(The cinema here had teamed it up with "Beavis and Butthead Do 
America" which had a certain sense: "Hehe, hehe, dinosaurs ...  
this is so cool.")
The lacklustre plotting of "Jurassic Park' was to some extent
made up for by its SFX. Despite much touted improvements, those
of "The Lost World" are only incrementally better, some of the
matting being downright clumsy.  Now that CGI can do anything,
special effects alone are not enough to push a film.  The
direction and photography are reasonably accomplished, given the
story problems.  (One notes Spielberg's total inability to scare
anyone except with in-your-face surprises and loud noises.)
Conversely, the acting fails to survive the travails.  Jeff
Goldblum (the thinking man's Christopher Lambert) loses his
luddite speeches of the first film and gets some neat one-liners,
but fails to convince us that he is in anyway in jeopardy during
the film.  Julianne Moore's career is going straight to movie
hell if she doesn't break out of bland roles like this.  Her sole
function seems to be to accidently endanger the rest of the
party.  It's difficult to care about anyone else during the film,
because it's difficult to even catch their name.  Only Pete
Postlethwaite shows any depth as a hunter with a philosophical bent.
The film finally comes to life at the end with a T. Rex rampaging
through the city.  Unfortunately the cuteness of this part is
diminished by the no-brain setup.  (The dinosaur kills everyone
on the boat, including those below deck or in the small rooms,
and locks itself in the cargo hold?  Right ...)
In summary, "The Lost World" is only slightly more stupid than
predecessor but more lazily plotted and vastly less original and
hence much less interesting.  This is nowhere near the worse film
you could see this year, but it is one of the least inventive.
It might also be added that it is amazingly violent for the
rating it got and is unsuitable as a children's movie.
[*/misfire] and Friday's fish returning as Monday's fish
casserole on the Sid and Nancy scale.
"The Lost World"
Directed by Steven Spielberg.
Based on the novel by Michael Crichton.
Starring Jeff Goldblum, Julianne Moore, Pete Postlethwaite, Arliss
Howard, Vanessa Lee Chester, Vince Vaughn.
Released 1997.
------
paul-michael agapow (agapow@latcs1.oz.au), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse
"There is no adventure, there is no romance, there is only trouble and desire."
[archived at http://www.cs.latrobe.edu.au/~agapow/Postviews/]

Title
Review for Starship Troopers (1997)
I couldn't wait for that smarmy little brunette to die.
It's the near future, shortly after the Californian invasion of Buenos 
Aires which looks like a live action version of "The Jetsons" done by 
the cast of "90210".  (Albeit with considerably less animation.)  Here 
our pearly-teethed teens are beset with those eternal problems of the 
spirit: Who will win the big football game?  Who shall I go to the 
prom with?  Shall I join the military, dress up as a Nazi and lay 
waste to the known universe?  Since Michael "Bad SF is my middle name" 
Ironside is playing their mono-handed Civics teacher, we can safely 
arrive at two conclusions: (1) We are in Bad Movie heaven, (2) 
Universe, bend over.
Sure enough, uber-Aryan Johnny Rico (played by that famous Argentinean 
actor Casper Van Dien) ends up in the grunts and is sent across to the 
next sound stage for routine bastardisation in Movie Cliche #253 (Boot 
Camp).  His friends show considerably more sense and join the 
technical branches.  Johnny's lust-thang Carmen (played by the noted 
Hispanic thespian Denise Richards) becomes a pilot, where she grins 
like a prom-queen on Prozac as she hurls around million-ton starships.  
Since their buddy Carl (that noted Latin artist Neil Patrick Harris, 
aka Doogie Howser) can tell his ferret to crawl up his mother's leg, 
he naturally gets put in charge of grand strategy.  Only Dizzy (the 
up-and-coming Spanish performer Dina Meyer, known for her subtle, 
tear-jerking performance alongside Keanu Reeves in "Johnny Catatonic") 
also joins the infantry.  You see, Johnny is her lust-thang and she 
realises that as soon as she sleeps with him, she can be killed off 
and leave the movie.
Time passes, although all too slowly for the audience.  Carmen 
realises Johnny has the IQ of toast and sends him a "Dear Johnny" 
letter.  Dizzy, in an attempt to precipitate her own demise, shows her 
breasts.  In a training exercise, Johnny accidentally gets a fellow 
marine killed.  The other recruits - willing to have their limbs 
broken, trachea crushed and be stabbed and shot at by their drill 
instructor - find Johnny's clumsiness unacceptable and start dropping 
out of the program.  (Or maybe it was his acting they find 
unacceptable.)  But before Johnny can follow suite, the dreaded alien 
bugs fart an asteroid across the galaxy and squish Buenos Aires.  
Although Johnny's parents look relieved just before they are crushed, 
everyone else knows it's time to kick some arthropod butt!
Johnny and his grunts are choppered out to the Bug homeworld, where 
the starships are threatened by bugs belching nuclear plasma into 
orbit.  (I swear, I am not making this up.)  But Carmen's serotonin 
levels are still wildly over par and, grinning like the widow of a 
recently dead rock star, she hauls her ship out of the way.  Johnny 
and Co are meanwhile demonstrating the dazzling power of future 
military tactics: dump a bunch of guys armed with M16s on a planet and 
get them to wander around in a tight pack until they are eaten and 
thus show how the monster works.  Sure 'nuff, the bugs show up and 
have far more charisma than the rest of the cast.  Demoralised, the 
marines retreat, leaving their less likeable colleagues to be eaten.
Digression 1: The Starship Troopers Drinking Game
- Sip whenever a limb is cut off.
- Quaff every time someone is cut in half.
- Sip whenever Diz lusts after Johnny.
- Quaff any time that smarmy little brunette smiles.
- Scull any time someone makes an heroic sacrifice.
The survivors are transferred to another unit, the 5th Generic Tough 
Hombres.  Quelle surprise - it's lead by Michael Ironside, still 
serving time in purgatory for "Highlander 2".  It seems they're 
getting sent to the poetically named "Planet P" to further the plot.  
But upon getting there, they are attacked by - giant mosquitoes!  (No, 
it's too terrible!)  Ironside makes Johnny promise to kill him should 
he ever be crippled.  Unfortunately Johnny doesn't reply, "If it comes 
to that, I'll do both of us."  The grunts come across a devastated 
firebase and a cowardly general.  He tells them that the bugs are 
sucking people's brains out (too late!)  and then gets eaten.  
Ironside has his legs chewed off by a bug and gets Johnny to kill him 
- not because he is crippled but because he is trapped in a crap film.  
Unfortunately Johnny doesn't cap the rest of the cast for equally 
debilitating mental injuries.  Subsequently, Dizzy gets chomped by a 
bug, because we got to see her breasts earlier on.
Back on the starship, they load Dizzy into a coffin and eject her into 
space so she can land on the Genesis planet and come back in the 
sequel "Starship Troopers 2: The Search for Plot".  Carmen struggles 
not to smile during the funeral, Dizzy's convenient death clearing the 
way for her and Johnny's lust-thang.  Then Doogie shows up, in full 
Gestapo regalia.  It now becomes clear why everyone looks like Nazis: 
the war is being run by geeks and geeky kids think that Nazi stuff is 
really cool.  Doogie explains he knew Johnny's team would be 
massacred, it was all part of the plan.  Johnny has no strong 
objections to this, illustrating a good reason why he is in the 
infantry and Doogie in command.  Anyway, the Doog-ster explains that 
since the bugs can launch asteroids from halfway across the galaxy and 
have them land right on top of cities, they must be intelligent.  
(Duh.)  So it's back to Planet P to catch a "brainbug".
Digression 2: Southpark Troopers
--------------------------------
Wouldn't this movie be all the more plausible if it was cheap 
animation and used the "Southpark" characters?
STAN:  Dude!  You're got a bug sucking your brains out!
CARTMAN:  I hate dat, da way dose bugs crawl up yo' ass and suck your 
   brains out.
KENNY:  Mi fnk ht d bgsar minhellgen.
KYLE:  Good point Kenny, there's probably a form of bug we haven't 
   seen yet, a brainbug.
BUG:  Arrrhhhhh!!!
STAN:  Oh my god!  They've killed Kenny!
Back they go to the disused quarries of Planet P. But Carmen and the 
faux competitor for her affections, Zander (hitherto known as 
"Deadmeat"), crash on the planet in the middle of the attack.  They 
are captured by the bugs and before Carmen can explain her "don't 
worry, be happy" philosophy to the insects, they suck Zander's brain.  
Johnny gives a stirring speech that they can't just go and rescue her, 
because the attack is too important.  He then goes and rescues her.  
Meanwhile the other troops have caught the brainbug.  And who better 
to mindmeld with a giant slug than Doogie Howser!  He does the Spock 
thang and announces that the brainbug is afraid.
Digression 3: Five Military SF Books That Would Make Better Films
Humour mode off.  There will undoubtedly be those who will defend 
"Starship Troopers" by saying that it is a comedy.  Certainly there 
are moments that are intended to be funny, but it is no more a comedy 
than "Total Recall" or "Robocop".  Similarly, some may say that the 
future depicted is meant to be dystopian and terrible.  The lie is put 
to this by again invoking Verhoeven's other two SF films.  Both of 
them depicted unpleasant regimes, even ones with which the characters 
cooperated and supported.  But the heroes never liked their worlds, 
nor showed it as a viable or desirable one.  If Verhoeven is 
attempting to be satirical, he fails utterly and my suspicion is that 
he is attempting to have it both ways, to both laugh at and cheer the 
fascist, testosterone-poisoned, gungho histrionics.  The situation is 
not helped by a wooden cast that can only aspire to being B-grade, 
dialogue that gives the word "cliche" a bad name, and a plot that 
could be second guessed by undiscovered tribes in the Phillipine 
jungles.
"Starship Troopers" is possibly the worst SF movie ever made [0/bomb], 
a leprous turd of a film that's so horribly demented that it 
immediately is assumed into the pantheon of Truly Bad Movies, with a 
crassness score of 4 Lamberts.  In fact it is so terrible that you 
should rush out and see it now because you will not believe how bad it 
is.  Tuberculosis on the Sid and Nancy scale.
------
paul-michael agapow (agapow@computer.org), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse
"There is no adventure, there is no romance, there is only trouble and desire."
Archived at 

Title
Review for Faculty, The (1998)
A group of misfit high school students grow suspicious of their teachers.
Have they been replaced by sinister alien doubles?  What are their plans
for Earth?  Have aliens infiltrated the rebels?  Is this just a crap SF
film?
Kevin Williamson is chiefly (in fact only) for his self referential and
ironic horror films "Scream" and "I Know What You Did Last Summer".
Neither were exactly post-modern classics.  A bad horror film where the
characters know that they are in a bad horror film is - in-jokes, knowing
winks to the audience, homage to genre aside - still a bad horror film.
His screenplay for "The Faculty" does nothing to change this track record.
Although endless comparisons have been made to the cult SF flick "Invasion
of the Body Snatchers", "The Faculty" bears a greater resemblance to a more
recent film, John Carpenter's "The Thing".  (Actually two scenes are stolen
outright: a walking autonomous head, and a "loyalty test" to ascertain who
can be trusted.)  The strange behaviour of their teachers leads a diverse
group of students to conclude their school has been taken over.  But their
own ranks have been infiltrated and as their numbers drop, suspicion
blossoms within the group.  In the hands of Carpenter, this created a
claustrophobic atmosphere, with a team that needed to trust each other
being unable to.  "The Faculty" is by contrast a sloppily constructed film.
Starting with a group of uniquely unlikable characters (the bitchy
cheerleader, the drug dealer, the professional victim nerd, the dumb jock),
they are brought together implausibly and just as implausibly start to
fight.  The only reason for the timing of their squabble seems to be that
this was around when it happens in other films of this type.  It may be
interesting to see who gets taken over next, but the director doesn't play
fair here.  Several party members turn when there has been no opportunity
for them to have been converted.  In a flashback late in the film we are
reshown a previous scene, including something that clearly didn't happen in
it.  Rather than redirect our attention or be clever with our sympathies
the film just lies to get out of plot cul-de-sacs.
The acting is passable, with creditable performances by Famke Janssen, Bebe
Neuwirth and Piper Laurie in small roles.  . Salma Hayek however shows
herself to be a talent-free zone by failing to carry a three-minute
appearance as a school nurse.  Clea DuVall does a nice turn as as a gloomy
outsider, shining against the rest of the glossy teenage leads.  I'd like
to say something positive about director Robert Rodriguez, who looked so
promising when he made the shoestring budget "El Mariachi".  However any
number of dull Hollywood hacks could have made "The Faculty", with its
off-the-shelf direction.  Regrettably, another talent bites the dust.
So the central characters are the geek, the jock, the prom queen ...  no,
hang about, that was "The Breakfast Club".  One thing about Kevin
Williamson scripts is that they're like so many other films you've seen
before.  Like one of those composite photos made by averaging hundreds of
faces, there's something elusively familiar about it all.  (Or, to pick a
genre example, the shimmer suits from Philip K Dick's "A Scanner Darkly".)
In fact, this cut-and-paste passes as narrative.  When considering how to
defeat the aliens, the characters decide apropos no evidence whatsoever
that it must be the same way as in Heinlein's "The Puppet Masters".  Of
course they turn out to be right.  When the heroes do so little to deserve
victory, can you really be interested in the outcome?
In his book of essays "A Supposedly Fun Thing I'll Never Do Again", Mark
Foster Wallace ponders why there is so much bad television and why people
still watch so much.  The reason, he decides, is that television is
fundamentally ironic.  On one hand it parades its importance ("don't miss",
"don't go away", "hear it first") while on the other hand giving a sly
wink.  You and I know, it says, this is all a joke.  What's the harm?  So
programs can simultaneously portray themselves as vital and garbage, as
original and derivative, as unmissable and disposable.  Wallace may not
have Williamson's number, but he is in the right area code.  "The Faculty"
tries to be tense by being predictable, to tell a scary story by copying
other scary stories, to cover up plot holes by hiding in genre.  It's not a
poorly made film - it's just not even trying to be a good film.
And this isn't going to do.  How long has it been since the last really
scary film you saw.  (For me it was the launch sequence in "Contact".)  Why
has SF, in fact big box office film, become action-comedy SFX by default?
Does anyone make serious and sincere films anymore?  It's very easy to
produce ironic, self-referential work, escaping any responsibility for
being derivative or illogical with a plea that it's a parody.  It's a lot
harder to actually produce something new and be prepared to face criticism
head-on.
"The Faculty" isn't a terrible film, but it's a terribly lazy one and a bad
sign for the future.  [*/misfire] and "Death to the archdemon
 Williamson!" on the Sid and Nancy scale.
"The Faculty"
Released 1998.
Directed by Robert Rodriguez.
Screenplay by Kevin Williamson.
Starring Jordana Brewster, Clea DuVall, Laura Harris, Josh Hartnett,
   Shawn Hatosy, Salma Hayek, Famke Janssen, Piper Laurie, Bebe Neuwirth,
   Robert Patrick, Elijah Wood.
--
Paul-Michael Agapow (p.agapow@ic.ac.uk), Biology, Imperial College
"We were too young, we lived too fast and had too much technology ..."

Title
Review for Bordello of Blood (1996)
The second outing from the "Tales From the Crypt" crew: the prim
Katherine (Eleniak) works for moneyed evangelist Reverend Current
(Sarandon).  However her brother (Feldman) has gone missing and
she turns to sleazy two-bit detective Guttman (Miller).  He in
turn is lead to a funeral home which is a front for a brothel run
by arch-vampire Lillith (Everhart) ...
There is a big problem at the heart of the "Tales from the
Crypt" formula , TV and movies, which is difficult to put a
finger on.  But the epicenter is this: for the writers (4 on
"Bordello of Blood") and producers (11!)  this is not so much an
attempt to create a new story as it is to slavishly imitate a
genre.  Or perhaps to slavishly imitate their idea of a genre.
Thirty years ago, cheap and nasty four-colour comics titillated
15 year-olds.  Now those 15 year-olds have translated the comics
to the big screen, with much sentiment and little creativity.
In fact "Bordello of Blood" is not much of anything. Even at
the very concise runtime of 87 minutes (around 80 if you cut out
the superfluous shrieking bookends by that muppet with Tourettes,
the Cryptkeeper) it has barely enough to do.  The creators are
simply trading on the resonances of the movie, wanting you to say
"This is just like those old schlocky horror films and comics!
Great!"  But as the current revival of old TV favourites (Brady
Bunch, Flintstones, the Saint etc.)  demonstrates, bringing a
small idea to the big screen with big production values does not
necessarily make that idea big.  More the converse - a movie
length production demands movie size ideas and story, not just
money.  Those are things that "Bordello" ain't got.
Occasionally "Bordello" does spark, never to the extent that
its predecessor "Demon Knight" did, largely when some meta-joke
occurs.  Confronted with the vampiric bordello, the detective
Guttman starts theorising "duchovnian riffs".  Teenybopper
heartthrob Corey Feldman shows up just long enough to be
slaughtered mercilessly.  The cast is competent if unspectacular,
Eleniak and Everhart being present purely for their looks.
Sarandon alone shows some life, perhaps being not a great actor
but a good one.
About the worst thing you could say about "Bordello of Blood"
is that it's self-indulgent and largely harmless.  Perhaps the
"Tales" producers will retire the series or at least think more
before hauling it out next time.  [*/misfire] and velvet-covered
furniture on the Sid and Nancy scale.
"Tales from the Crypt Presents: Bordello of Blood"
Directed by Gilbert Adler.
Starring Dennis Miller, Erika Eleniak, Angie Everhart, Chris Sarandon,
   Corey Feldman.
Released 1996.
------
paul-michael agapow (agapow@latcs1.oz.au), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse
[archived at http://www.cs.latrobe.edu.au/~agapow/Postviews/]

Title
Review for Snow White (1997)
The classic fairy tale, fed ("Fargo" style) through a tree shredder.
The media-astute amongst you will recognise "The Grimm Brothers' Snow 
White" as the latest in the string of "X's Y".  For example:
It is also a member of that dubious class known as Films With Many 
Names (also known as Films That Are Not Very Good), scuttling around 
like an international master criminal under various nom-de-plumes:
which evokes images of sequel films like "What Snow White Did Next" 
and "Snow White From Navarone".  This schizophrenic identity is 
indicative of a picture that would like to reinvent an old myth, but 
instead just slaps on a fresh coat of paint and sticks a huge 
extension out the back.  It's not exactly a bad film, but one that is 
not as brave as it needed to be.
We commence the film with a tragic carriage accident somewhere in the 
faux Middle Ages.  Lord Friedrich Hoffman (Sam Neill, no - really) is 
distraught at losing his beautiful wife and vows he will not show any 
facial expressions until he can remarry and advance the plot.  But at 
least he still has his daughter, the utterly resistible Lilli (Taryn 
Davis).  You see, she is named after her unfortunate mother.  Holy 
Freudian overtones, Batman!
Sure 'nuff, after some years Lilli is replaced by another actor (the 
even more resistible Monica Keena) and the Lord Friedrich announces he 
will get married to the mysterious Claudia (Sigourney Weaver).  With 
la Sigourney flouncing around the castle, complete with malevolent 
mute manservant and a wardrobe that occasionally blinds the cleaning 
staff, things start to get interesting at last.  La Sigourney wants to 
have a child with Friedrich (which is one method of determining 
whether he's alive or not, I guess) and Lilli pouts a lot.  Finally, 
one of Lilli's tantrums causes her step-mother to miscarry.  La 
Sigourney cranks the acting dial up to "11" and storms dishevelled 
around the castle, wielding her manservant liberally and talking to 
the mirror in her wardrobe.  (The mirror's reflection incidentally, 
does a nice fuzzy lens effect that William Shatner would be proud of.)  
She tries to resurrect her dead baby, casts a sleeping spell on the 
castle (inadvertently resolving the issue of whether Sam Neill is 
conscious or not) and casts Lilli out into the deep woods, distracting 
her would-be beau, the wholly unremarkable Dr Peter Gutenberg (David 
Conrad, in a career-stalling appearance).
It is about here that the film's inventions start getting problematic.  
In the earlier scenes, Claudia is sympathetically drawn as a 
stepmother that is trying hard with a new and uncooperative daughter.  
Then the daughter's actions cause her to derail, drool wildly and 
start dabbling in the dark arts.  As in "Bram Stoker's Dracula", we 
are left with the perplexing issue of whether our villain is a damned 
vile creature, or just someone with a few issues to resolve.  
("Tonight on Oprah - Satan, Master of All Evil or Just 
Misunderstood?")  Either way, it seems clear the actions of the bratty 
Lilli has pushed her onto this path, which allows no happy nor 
satisfying conclusion.
(Also problematic is the mirror charming Claudia with talk of how 
beautiful she is, and then presenting the shocking news that there is 
one more beautiful than her - Lilli.  I mean: Hello?  We're talking 
about Sigourney Weaver here?  The mirror doesn't have to like to her!  
And you're comparing her unfavourably to the whiny, pasty Lilli?)
In the forest, Lilli encounters not the Seven Dwarfs but the Six 
Impoverished and Politically Disenfranchised Homeboys.  One of them is 
actually short, but if you were a Freudian you might think that their 
lack of power and - hence - metaphorical economic and civil 
emasculation, make them "dwarfs" in a political sense.  (No, that 
didn't fly for me either.)  The Six (And Shortly To Be Five then Four) 
Homeboys fight over whether they should kill, ransom or protect Lilli.  
And it doesn't matter how many times you watch the film, they always 
make the wrong decision.
Needless to say, Lilli with the help of her homies eventually caps her 
evil but well-intentioned stepmother, La Sigourney chewing scenery all 
the way.  Lilli's boyfriend shows back up again and - alas - Sam Neill is 
revived and rescued, which means that "Event Horizon" will get made.  
Darn.
Once again, not a bad film (but who can tell after "Starship 
Troopers"?)  and more one that speaks of a horrible design by 
committee, where no one vision is allowed to dominate and the film ends 
up going several directions at once.  Sigourney is as always good even 
in bad roles, Neill continues to snooze his career away, and we have 
an elegant proof that you don't have to be European to make bad 
arthouse films.  [*/misfire], casual inelegance on the Sid and Nancy 
scale.
------
Paul-Michael Agapow (agapow@computer.org)
"There is no adventure, there is no romance, there is only trouble and desire."

Title
Review for Waterworld (1995)
"Mad Max 2" recast with lots of water and too much budget.
"Waterworld" is, of course, one of the most reviled and sneered at 
pictures of recent times.  So fierce and scathing was the reaction to 
the picture, even before release, that it was virtually guaranteed to 
fail.  It alone may have terminated the career of its director and 
star, Kevin Costner.  But is it really that bad?  In this cynical post 
"Starship Troopers" era, this question deserves to be asked.
For those who came in late - The icecaps have melted and the entire 
world is covered by water.  Humans eke out an existence on the 
surface, on boats and in floating towns.  Kevin Costner is a mutant, 
shunned by society and forced to rely only on himself.  Strangely 
enough, in this film he also plays a mutant, shunned by society and 
forced to rely only on himself.  He ends up in possession of Jeanne 
Tripplehorn and her surly charge, a child with a map of dry land 
tattooed on her back.  There's also a bunch of pirates who, since they 
are lead by Dennis Hopper, must attack Costner psychotically until the 
end of the movie.  Purportedly this is to get the map, but actually 
it's just so something happens between sailing sequences.
There are a lot of things wrong with "Waterworld".  A decent attempt 
is made at swashbuckling action, with Costner biffing waves of pirate 
rabble.  Unfortunately the Kev-ster is far too stodgy and aloof to 
make a charismatic hero, although to be fair this is probably the 
result of him trying to appear tough and self-reliant.  There is much 
distressed leather and carefully draped rags for fashion.  Should 
Jeanne Tripplehorn ever get her eyebrows plucked, she will be unable 
to act at all.  Given the areactive chemistry generated between her 
and Costner, perhaps it would be best if she retired and sold the 
options on her name to some aspiring porn actress.  And towards the 
end the movie
But having said that, "Waterworld" is not all that bad.  The world is 
preposterous, but no more so that a lot of other films.  As said 
above, there's some decent action.  Dennis Hopper (whose career may 
not be destroyed by conventional weaponry) wheels out his violent 
psycho shtick again, but at least he is having some fun.  There's 
explosions, some nicely setup jokes, a reasonably paced first section 
and some good photography of scenes set against the wide empty sea.
"Waterworld" is no trashier, and no more ambitious, than "Independence 
Day" or "Jurassic Park" or a number of other Big Dumb Pictures (BDPs).  
So why was it reviled so much?  Certainly, if this was a B-grade film 
(directed by, say, Roger Corman) which instead of starring Costner, 
Hopper and Tripplehorn starred Charlie Sheen, Rutger Hauer and 
Tripplehorn, no-one would have batted an eyelid.  Unless we credit 
purely random forces, it may be that "Waterworld" didn't play the 
publicity game well enough and entered a market that was unreceptive 
to a BDP.  The extraordinary budget is another question.  While it is 
an issue that is largely transparent to the movie-goer, it is sobering 
to think that on some level instead of "Waterworld" we could have got 
another "Gattaca", "In the Mouth of Madness" and "Until the End of the 
World".  (Or another "Metropolitan", "Simple Men", "Jesus of Montreal" 
and handful of other independent pictures.) On this level, 
"Waterworld" is flagrantly wasteful, especially since the budget 
really doesn't show to any extent.
I would hesitate to recommend something that is so ephemeral.  But 
count this review as a small rehabilitation of "Waterworld".  While 
not a deep or great picture, the savaging it received was unjustified 
and may have prevented an actor/director from realising his full 
potential.  [**/ok] and a lesser Errol Flynn on the Sid and Nancy 
scale.
"Waterworld"
Released 1995.
Directed by Kevin Reynolds and Kevin Costner
Starring Kevin Costner. Dennis Hopper, Jeanne Tripplehorn Majorino.
--
Paul-Michael Agapow (agapow@latcs1.oz.au)
Postviews SF/F reviews & mailing-list at www.cs.latrobe.edu.au/~agapow/Postviews

Title
Review for Pi (1998)
Max, a reclusive mathematician (Gulette), sifts through the dataflow 
of the financial markets looking for a unifying pattern.  His 
computers misbehave and break down, he suffers a series of terrifying 
psychotic attacks and two separate groups pursue him: a group of 
stockmarket brokers and an enigmatic clan of Talmudic scholars ...
"Pi" is possibly the best science-fiction film of the year.  There are 
those who might argue that it isn't SF - hair-splitting in my opinion 
- but even then, "Pi" is possibly the best psychological thriller of 
the year.  Loopy, paranoid, daring and unnerving, it may herald the 
arrival of a major new directing talent.
It is also another entry in the extremely low budget film stakes.  (To 
get the tried cliches out of the way: "young filmmaker ...  couldn't 
get backing ...  shoestring budget ...  masterpiece ...  one in the 
eye for Hollywood ...  blah, blah ...")  To my mind, this is both 
irrelevant and important for the movie viewer.  Relevant, because (of 
course) budget does have an impact on the look and effectiveness of 
the final problem.  Although director Aronofsky makes excellent use of 
washed out B&W footage and found locations, at times the jerky camera 
and shadows conspire to make the action hard to see.  Conversely, low 
budget films are important for they stand in contrast to the resource 
gobbling Hollywood behemoths, and remind us of all the films that 
aren't getting made because of ridiculous budgets and star salaries.  
(Is "Titanic" 2000 times better than "Pi"?  Is "Out of Sight" 20 times 
better than "Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels"?).
Max's beliefs are not so far removed from those scientists working in 
complex systems, and the Platonic idealism of Roger Penrose and Paul 
Davies.  (Indeed, some years ago a group of complexity theorists set 
up a company to look for and exploit patterns in the stockmarket.)  
Maths is pure, maths is reality.  Everything happens because of maths.
If only life was like maths, predictable and comprehendible.  If only 
we could understand the maths of life ...  Max is a king in his own 
world but, like so many savants, at a disadvantage outside of it.  At 
the mercy of mental illness, tormented by the sounds of lovemaking 
coming through the thin walls of his apartment, frustrated by fallible 
hardware, he tries to extend maths to rule over the rest of the world.
It's a intense portrayal of a paarnoid and claustrophobic life.  And 
thankfully the script has the courage to avoid portraying Max as a 
freak genius.  Although maths is easy to him, we see him working 
at it, spending his life trying to understand and grasping for the big 
questions.  I can't think of another movie that has had the guts to 
portray science as long hard work.  Actually, "Pi" may be the one of 
the most scientifically hip movies to ever be made.  There are passing 
references to childhood experiments with potatoes and iodine, 
antfarms, the golden ratio and cellular automata.  Perhaps I speak 
from a biased perspective, but it's great to see these things 
acknowledged.
There are those who would argue the premise of "Pi" is ludicrous.  
(Here I must be circumspect to avoid giving away the plot.)  Mileage 
will vary of course, and towards the end "Pi" starts going off the 
deep end, but this argument seems a little churlish to me.  Did people 
really expect a movie to suggest a plausible and revolutionary 
discovery in mathematics?  All science fiction "fakes it" to make a 
story work, which it will as long as the lies are consistent and not 
too outrageous.
The cast asides from Max do well, from the his tormented teacher 
(Margolis) to his his sensual neighbour (Shoaib).  A driven and 
compelling movie, "Pi" is good value on every level.  [****/mustsee] 
and a childhood electronics kit on the Sid and Nancy scale.
--
Paul-Michael Agapow (p.agapow@ic.ac.uk), Biology, Imperial College
"We were too young, we lived too fast and had too much technology ..."

Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
A bunch of good ol' boys are sent into space to bicker and eventually 
destroy yet another asteroid on an Earth-bound course. There is much 
shouting and explosions.
Starting late last year, we were subjected to teaser ads that declared 
"1998 is closer than you think!".  By June and the release of "Deep 
Impact", with teasers still coming thick and fast, I was beginning to 
wonder if that line was intended as a reminder to the filmmakers.  But 
"Armageddon" has arrived at last and proves to be much like other 
Bruckheimer productions (e.g. "Con Air", "The Rock"), only more so.  
And this is how it is:
As you all know, cosmic objects can't help but attack the North 
American continent and well known landmarks.  All it takes is a quick 
meteor shower on New York, the destruction of the Chrysler building 
(again) and NASA realises that it's in the middle of a disaster film.  
An asteroid "the size of Texas" is headed straight for Earth.  
Terrified by the idea of there being two Texases (or Texii), NASA 
honcho Billy Bob Thornton panics.  He's surrounded by a bunch of geeks 
and the only people who can solve problems like this are men, real men 
like ...
... restaurateur and sometime actor Bruce Willis, here playing a 
psychotic gun-nut.  When he's not threatening employees with a shotgun 
or being Oedipal with his daughter (Liv Tyler, rigid and with pupils 
the size of theoretical nuclear particles), Bruce is the best oil well 
driller on the planet .  So when Bruce is shown NASA's plan (as is 
traditional, land on asteroid, drill a hole and blow it up with a 
couple of nukes left over from the Cold War), he scoffs at the idea of 
sending astronauts to do a man's job.  What you really need is a group 
of psychotic gun-nuts.  The Michigan Militia aren't available, so 
Bruce's drillcrew are on the job.  As the crew contains Clear Eyed 
Singlet Hero (Ben Affleck), Mr Pink (Steve Buscemi), Big Black Dude, 
Cowboy and Retard, you realise you are about to descend into Character 
Actor Hell.
The oil crew kid around a lot while Ben Affleck and Liv Tyler make a 
bid for Most Annoying Screen Couple of All Time.  Realising that this 
quest is doomed (Richard Burton and Elizabeth Taylor having a lock on 
that title), they blast off for the asteroid, stopping only for some 
brief racism on a Russian space station.  Later the gravitational pull 
exerted by Bruce's ego causes one of the shuttles to crash, killing a 
lot of nameless astronauts and Ben Affleck.  In response the audience 
goes wild and Liv Tyler goes catatonic.  In fact the shock is so great 
that it reaches back in time and renders her catatonic from the 
beginning of the film.  But back on Earth, we can see people following 
the tribulations of our heroes.  Curiously enough, from these segments 
we can see that the population of the United States consists of (a) 
New York, and (b) some bucolic never-never-land, filmed through a 
foggy lens, populated by hayseeds who peer anxiously at the TV between 
holding soapbox derbys and mopping the cows.  Did they just splice in 
clips from "The Waltons"?
But things are going too well, and there's an hour of film and six 
gadzillion dollars of special effects to use up.  So, in short order 
(a) the military try and stab our boys in the back, (b) Mr Pink grabs 
a gun and starts shooting things, and (c) the asteroid attacks the 
crew.  Really.  All those hayseeds back in Ray-Bradbury-land look 
anxious and squint at their TVs.  Will our heroes make it before the 
precisely plotted deadline?
"Armageddon" is raucous, noisy, bigoted and dumb by turns.  It goes on 
for far too long, piles on the pathos and setbacks to the point of 
absurdity and is so intent on setting up its ragtag team as rebels 
and the only ones who can do the job, that everyone else looks 
incompetent.  Consider the basic absurdity of scenes like where the 
team hard bargains for its rewards.  (Think about it - cancel my 
parking tickets and give me a tax free income or the planet dies.)  
But "Armageddon" is the only BDP (Big Dumb Picture) of recent times to 
even partially succeed, with the sound and fury distracting you from 
plot idiocies.  There are even some good things about "Armageddon".  
At least it realises that there is a world outside of North America 
(unlike "Deep Impact") and deals with the disaster as a global event, 
complete with nice if cliched images of Parisian cafes, church 
services in Italy, prayer meetings in India.  A few of the supporting 
characters are well drawn too, and shine past the competitive 
overacting of the leads.  (Or underacting in Liv Tyler's case.)
All in all, one should not think too closely about this picture.  
Place your critical judgement aside and accept it as a disposable 
piece of entertainment that will quickly fade as you leave the cinema, 
leaving not even a bad taste behind.  [**/ok] and boutique 
beer on the Sid and Nancy scale.
--
Paul-Michael Agapow (p.agapow@ic.ac.uk), Dept. Biology, Imperial College
"We were too young, lived too fast and had too much technology ..."

Title
Review for Blade (1998)
The eponymous hero (Wesley Snipes) is a half-vampire, which means that
he gets all the cool superpowers with none of the disadvantages. He also
gets a legitimate excuse to slot real vampires, including the sneering
Deacon Frost (Stephen Dorff) with muchos pyrotechnics and martial arts.
And a good thing too.
Think "Wesley Snipes", think "vampires", think "adapted from a comic".
Think "what's on in the theatre next door?"
But that would be a mistake because while "Blade" is a dumb action
flick, it's at least enjoyably and inoffensively dumb, with lots of
pretty lights and motion. The slim plot contains several colourful
vignettes. A vampire culture underlies modern society, split between the
old world corporate types (lead by professionally oily Udo Kier) and the
youthful hedonistic rebels (led by Dorff). (We know they're rebels
because they dress scruffily, listen to loud music and smoke. They're so
k3wl.) Quicker than you can say "deus ex machina" the rebels have staged
a coup, deciphered the previously undecipherable prophetic scrolls, and
get set to unleash major nastiness on the world. In between working out
with an Abdominizer, Blade acquires a new sidekick (thus signalling a
short lifespan for his old sidekick) and then kicks some butt. Fin.
But what does the film do right? First on the list are the surprisingly
adept action scenes. Fluidly choreographed and colourful, they bear
comparison to the kinetics of Hong Kong cinema. Snipes, ridiculously
buff and self-serious, is actually well suited to this genre. An actor
he isn't, but he is an impressive special effect. And while we're on
SFX, there are some nicely placed ones. Vampires shot with silver
bullets burn down to ashes in midstep. Staked vampires crumble to dust
before they hit the floor. It's a tasty if gory eye-fest. Actually the
direction of the whole film is quite eye-catching, with an elegant
selection of sped-up scenes and washed-out landscapes. Combined with
some catchy music and a few genuinely scary setpieces (especially the
opening scene in a vampire nightclub where a horde of vampires attack a
victim on a bloodsoaked dancefloor), and I think that director
Norrington (who has no track record of remark) may be a name to watch
out for.
There are a few missteps - there's little evidence of humour here, which
the more serious moments need, and as mentioned the plot borders on the
intangible. But it is a pretty and fun piece of trash. Rated as such,
it's [***/interesting] and better than a poke in the eye on the Sid and
Nancy scale.
--
Paul-Michael Agapow (p.agapow@ic.ac.uk), Dept. Biology, Imperial College
"We were too young, we lived too fast and had too much technology ..."

Title
Review for Cyborg 2: Glass Shadow (1993)
It is the late 21st century and the ruthless Pinwheel corporation
has perfectly Glass Shadow, an explosive reagent that they put
into androids so as to use them as assassination devices.  One
such android Cash (Jolie) elopes with martial arts instructor
Colt (Koteas).  Pursued by the sinister tracker Danny (Drago),
they go on the run, seek the help of the mysterious Mercy
(Palance), yadda, yadda, yadda.
"A sequel to 'Cyborg', one of the worst Jean-Claude van Damme
pictures?  How can it fail?"  I hear you ask.  (Just above the
adolescents saying "Does Jolie get her clothes off?").  The
answer is "very quickly" (and "yes, but haven't you better things
to do?").  Nearly a Bad Movie, "Cyborg 2" is just a bad movie,
stock video store fodder.
The connection to the earlier film is fairly tenuous, with a
few gratuitous clips of Jean-Claude inserted at random into a
plot written by one of those novel-generating machines from
"1984".  In the all-too-typical opening scenes, a Pinwheel exec
demonstrates the power of the explosive Glass Shadow with a film
of (yes) an over-endowed female android having sex with her
target.  In rock-video montage, we see her orgasm and explode,
undeniably making the point that the scriptwriters have deep,
deep, psychological problems.  But instead the company decides
that this means they rule the world.
Jolie, working on her sneer, kicks a few heads to show how
deadly she is before running off with Koteas.  From that point on
_he_ does all the fighting.  (Don't ask me why.  Carry a
perfectly good killer android with you and insist on doing all
the fights yourself?  Maybe he was saving her for a suicide
mission against the producers.)  Jack Palance - a walking
advertisement for compulsory superannuation - growls, weeps and
issues cryptic hints to our heroes, obviously thinking of his
role in "Gor" and how that was supposed to be the bottom of the
barrel.  Drago plays the cyborg tracker as a cut-price Julian
Sands which is bad enough, but once you think that Sands must
have turned this role down, is even worse.
Rubbish and not even entertaining rubbish. Exactly how lame
does an idea have to be before it doesn't get made into a movie?
[*/misfire] and Jean-Claude squared on the Sid and Nancy scale.
------
paul-michael agapow (agapow@latcs1.oz.au), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse
[archived at http://www.cs.latrobe.edu.au/~agapow/Postviews/]
"There is no adventure, there is no romance, there is only trouble and desire."

Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
Or "How I Learned to Stop Worrying and Love the Bolide". An enraged 
comet attempts to land on Tea Leoni. America gets all mussed up. 
Apparently the rest of the world is a little put out too.
Two years ago, it was extreme weather.  Last year, it was severe 
geology.  This year, it's cosmic impact films.  In light of such 
obvious trend-following, a few fears are justified.  Are these going 
to be good films or just market-stuffers?  Now, little Steven 
Spielberg would never give us something like "Independence Day" or 
"Starship Troopers", would he?
No, but he might give us "The Colour Purple".
This is how it goes: young Leo Biederman discovers a new comet that is 
intent on squishing the United States (and incidentally destroying the 
rest of the world too).  Somehow, the entire astronomical community of 
the world is gagged until ace reporter Tea Leoni (showing a startling 
ability to play the same character she does on TV) comes snooping 
around.  The Prez (Morgan Freeman) crumbles and makes a nation-wide 
announcement: "We're all going to die."  The nation, as represented by 
a whole lot of B-grade TV actors competitive underplaying the "oh 
shucks, we're just folks" shtick, show concern by wrinkling their 
foreheads.
But it's all OK, the government is going to take care of everything.  
Strangely enough, this isn't interpreted as a reason for widespread 
panic.  No, how else do you defeat a rogue comet but by sending up a 
crack crew of astronauts, including one called "Spurgeon Tanner" 
(played by a curiously mummified Robert Duvall).  Hell, if I was a 
comet, that would throw me off-course.
And so it goes.  We can tell there is civil unrest, because the houses 
of a lot of white, middle-class people get messed up.  Tea realises 
that only people who are reconciled with their family are allowed to 
die and leave the film.  So she goes and mooches around with her 
father (Maximilian Schell, looking like he's been attacked with a 
bicycle pump) and her mother (Vanessa Redgrave).  Later, if you look 
away for a second, Redgrave just seems to dematerialise in the middle 
of the film.
Meanwhile the astronauts have stopped giggling at Spurgeon's name and 
realised that at least he has a character with more than one dimension.  
Angered by this, one astronaut (aggressive guy) says that Spurgeon is 
too old and should be making nostalgic movies with Laura Dern.  
Russian guy, black guy and female guy nod wisely.  Other guy realises 
that he has so little screen time, he must be scheduled to die later.  
And indeed, after they blast-off, move s-l-o-w-l-y through their ship 
to show you it's in zero gravity, they land on the comet and other guy 
dies.  (He dies after calculating that on an 11-km rock, gravity isn't 
just low, as the scriptwriters apparently believe - it's nonexistent.)
Aggressive guy and black guy get injured. Cowed by this, Russian guy 
and female guy let Spurgeon take over the mission.
Back on the ground, the government is selecting a million random 
people to stick in a set of caves in Missouri for the duration of the 
comet-induced nuclear winter.  Finally people can see the government 
is out of control.  (Missouri?  Are you kidding me?)  About 30 mildly 
aggressive demonstrators gather outside the caves to protest.  (I 
assume they're demonstrating - or maybe they've just had too much 
coffee.)  But now there are TWO comets, and while we might survive the 
first - which makes a high-pitched buzz as it moves through space - 
the deep rumble of the other tells us we're in trouble.  The Prez 
orders all the nuclear missiles to be fired offscreen at the comet.  
Later he tells us they failed.  (Just between you and me, I don't 
there ever were any missiles.  The Prez has probably been making out 
like a bandit on those Strategic Defence appropriations for years, 
occasionally staging a few accidents in Omaha silos to keep Congress 
from looking too closely.)  Subsequently a lot of people hug and make 
up just before they are killed, although not in any sort of up-close 
and icky way.
It would be churlish to deny there are some genuinely stirring moments 
in "Deep Impact".  In particular, those scenes involving Vanessa 
Redgrave and her character's realisation of, and resignation to, her 
own death are fairly powerful.  There is also some nice model work in 
the SFX and it is refreshing to see a film that doesn't glorify in its 
own bodycount.  However these are severely weakened by heavy-handed 
storytelling (alternately underlining or shortcutting the plot), an 
oppressively omnipresent soundtrack (forever whispering in your ear 
"this is a stirring emotional moment"), and indifferent acting.  It's 
not a bad picture, but it's an irritatingly simplistic one, almost 
claustrophobic in its narrow worldview.  [**/ok] and "The Comet 
Purple" on the Sid and Nancy scale.
"Deep Impact"
Released 1998.
Directed by Mimi Leder.
Produced by Steven Spielberg, Richard D. Zanuck et al.
Written by Bruce Joel Rubin  and Michael Tolkin.
Music by James Horner.
Starring Robert Duvall, Tea Leoni, Elijah Wood, Vanessa Redgrave,
        Morgan Freeman, Leelee Sobieski, Maximilian Schell, James Cromwell,
        Blair Underwood.
--
Paul-Michael Agapow (agapow@computer.org), La Trobe Uni
"There is no adventure, there is no romance, there is only trouble and desire."

Title
Review for Lair of the White Worm, The (1988)
In this adaptation of the Bram Stoker novel, a group of proper
English types with room-temperature IQs are mystified by a local
outbreak of vampirism, in between dream sequences that indulge
the director's fetishes.
Alexei Sayle once listed the basic mysteries of the
universe, concluding with "And why do people keep giving Ken
Russell money to make films?"  After this, you'll be wondering
why too.  His previous "Gothic" covered similar territory with at
least some skill.  In comparison, "Lair" takes a deep breath and
dive-bombs straight into Bad Movie Hell.
Gathering together everyone on the books with a regional
accent, we are introduced to the picturesque English countryside
and a village, seemingly with a population of about six.  Our
four leads gambol and frolic in a manner not unlike Enid Blyton's
"Famous Five".  Julian Sands having passed on this film, we
instead have Hugh Grant as dashing RAF pilot Lord James D'Ampton
(really), looking as if he was sedated.  (I envy him.)  The
neglected Peter Capaldi as a geek archaeologist gets to muse over
a giant snake skull he has dug up, his acres of curly hair
threatening to dominate every scene he is in.  Catherine Oxenburg
and Sammi Davis, their romantic interests, flit about until such
a point as they can be captured by the bad guys.  Just over on
the next set, the slinky Lady Sylvia Marsh (Amanda Donohoe, she
of the Acting Career That Would Not Die) chews scenery, stopping
only to slaughter the occasional anorak-wearing nerd.
But this is a Ken Russell film, it's been 20 minutes and there
haven't been any naked nuns yet!  Wheel them on!  Before you can
say "a clear need for Freudian analysis" there's a dream sequence
in which naked nuns are being raped by brutal centurions as a
gloomy Christ looks on, restrained by a large latex worm.
Tiring of jaunting about in sports cars, sipping apertifs
and competitive under-acting, Grant and Capaldi decide that
something is amiss.  (Although they wrongly conclude that it is
Lady Sylvia and not the director.)  Grant misses the obvious plan
(invite the Lady Sylvia into his car down on the main road, get
arrested and soon everyone will know what's going on) and
basically wanders about in Lady Sylvia's gothic mansion for the
rest of the picture.  Capaldi is attacked by a snake-policeman
and defends himself by charming the snake with music.  (Or maybe
it's an intense dislike of bagpipes.  Capaldi in a kilt with
bagpipes is a frightening thing.)  Soon Donohoe sheds her
clothes, paints herself blue and is threatening the girls with a
massive strap-on (and a role in the sequel).  But Capaldi has
protected himself with snake anti-serum ("Where's the acting
anti-serum?")  and Donohoe is engulfed by a giant bendy snake.
There are some more naked nuns in there somewhere, but it's
all become a blur to me.
Appalling.  [*/misfire] and "Cannibal Apocalypse" on the Sid
and Nancy scale.
------
paul-michael agapow (agapow@latcs1.oz.au), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse
"There is no adventure, there is no romance, there is only trouble and desire."

Title
Review for Mission to Mars (2000)
A Postview, copyright 2000 by Paul-Michael Agapow.
A heroic crew struggles to rescue a team of astronauts stranded on
Mars, stopping only for product placement and triumphant fanfares.
It has become traditional with every new Brian De Palma film to
tut-tut about how it's not up to his usual standard.  Which brings to
mind the question: Exactly what is De Palma's usual standard?  "Snake
Eyes"?  "Bonfire of the Vanities"?  Now to build on this history of
failed expectations comes Mission to Mars, a Steinbeckian idiot of a
film that smothers any sense in the script with its desperate clammy
grip.
The setup is this: the year is 2020 and Earth is going to Mars.  Of
course, when I say "Earth" I mean "America", just like when the film
says "international effort", they mean "NASA".  Now, Ray Bradbury
wrote about the small-town America going to Mars, with colonists
building homesteads and sitting on their front porches sipping
lemonade.  In contrast, "Mission to Mars" has a bunch of smug,
laddish, middle-class baby boomers going to Mars.  (I say "baby
boomers" but the characters are of course 30 years too young for the
way they dress, talk and the music they listen to.  I say "laddish"
but there are three female characters: one whose main function is to
fret, one that dies twenty minutes into the film and another who dies
before the film even starts.)  What we have here is "2001" as done by
Ron Howard.  Note: this is not a compliment.
But anyway, Earth is going to Mars.  Unfortunately (for the audience)
the first expedition is composed of Z-list actors and is thus doomed
to be wiped out by a mysterious alien artefact.  (Don't you hate it
when that happens?)  So a rescue mission is mounted DR PEPPER and is
entering Martian KAWASAKI orbit when disaster PENZOIL strikes and
their M&MS ship is BUDWEISER struck by SONY meteorites.  BUY MORE
STUFF. "Put on your helmet or you'll embolize!", worries the
femme-astronaut.  At first I thought it was a warning to the audience,
but it turns out the ship is in danger and mission commander Tim
Robbins is making his big bid to escape the script.  (The plucky
little guy looked kinda peaceful at the end, a happy little smile on
his face as he froze to death.)  The chick panics for a while, they
make a crash-landing on Mars and find the lone survivor.  ("Hey, we're
the rescue team!  Uh, you wouldn't have a spare spaceship lying around
would you?")
As bogus as the first part of the film is, it at least shows some grip
of orbit al mechanics and physics.  By contrast, the biology appears
to have been lifted from "Pokemon".  You see, the aliens have left a
secret message for humans, a message that may only be decoded by
someone who has seen "Contact".  The message turns out to be a DNA
sequence that is "missing a chromosome".  (Two possibilities: 1. 
No-one on the team knows anything about biology, or 2.  The
astronauts' confusion over basic molecular biology is due to NASA's
affirmative action policy on hiring the chromosomally challenged.) 
The astronautrix panics for a while, then concludes that if they fill
in the "missing chromosome", the mysterious alien artefact will usher
the astronauts into a really cool planetarium.  This happens. 
(Although surely it would have been a lot simpler and cheaper for NASA
to just send the guys to the Field Museum for the afternoon.)
The basic goofiness of "Mission to Mars" is compounded by lugheaded
dialogue and direction, with characters explaining what they have just
done or are just about to do, and computers helpfully announcing "AT
POINT OF NO RETURN" or "AIR LEVELS FALLING TO 30 PERCENT".  Note
please this is a film that has three names credited for the "story"
and three more for the "screenplay".  This smacks of writers who did
all their research by watching other movies - "Contact", "The Abyss",
"Apollo 13", "Close Encounters", "2001", "Silent Running" - while
watching the Discovery Channel for flavour.  Add in the strident
soundtrack and gobs of pseudoscience and you have a very unhappy
audience.
I'd describe "Mission to Mars" as dull, dumb and shitheaded but that
would be insulting other dull, dumb and shitheaded films.  It's not
even stupid enough to be fun.  It makes one yearn for the intellectual
thrust and parry of Starship Troopers.  [*/misfire] and that long
empty stretch of road north of Port Augusta on the Sid & Nancy scale.

Title
Review for Barb Wire (1996)
An adaptation of the comic of the same name: It is the 2nd
American Civil War, with the rebels fighting the brutal
Congressionalists.  In the neutral city of Steel Harbour is a
club run by the mercenary Barb Wire (Anderson).  To the city come
the rebels Axel Hood (Morrison) and Cora D (Rowell), who need to
escape to neutral Canada, the Congressionalists hard on their
heels.  But Axel and Barb have a history together ...
... and where better to find a way out of the country than at
Rick's Cafe Americaine, where anything can be bought or sold,
even the corrupt Inspector Renault?  Yes, it's "Casablanca" but
this remake was aided by modern technology and a few search and
replace expressions:
   s/Casablanca/Steel Harbour/;
   s/Rick Blaine/Barb Wire/;
   s/Ilsa Lunt/Axel Hood/;
   s/Victor Lazlo/Dr Cora D/;
   s/the fat man/the fat man/;
   s/papers of transit/retinal lens/;
   s/the train from Paris/the helicopter from Seattle/;
   s/"As Time Goes By"/generic thrash/;
   s/piano-playing black sidekick/butler-like German sidekick/;
   s/Nazis/Congressionalists/;
   s/cult classic/nork fest/;
There are differences, such as the regrettable absence of
Ugarte.  (Was Pee-Wee Herman busy that week?)  Also regrettable
is the fact that Morrison affects an American accent instead of
his native New Zealand-ish: "Bub Ware!  You've gut to hulp us!".
Cora D is no Victor Lazlo, so it comes as no surprise that
Axel/Ilsa is helping her not for any leadership skills but for an
antidote she has coded in her DNA (an apparent side-effect being
atrophy of the charisma gland).  Steve Railsback, once a
promising actor, demonstrates his career has gone straight to
hell with his portrayal of the frothing Colonel Pryzer.  Quick
trivia: the bouncer at Barb's club is played by Tom "Tiny" Lister
Jr., who is also the President in "The Fifth Element".
The big surprise is everyone's favourite silicon based
lifeform, Pamela Anderson.  A walking cartoon character herself,
she shows a reasonable skill and style as an action star which is
used to effect in the first half of the film.  A four-colour
nightmare in leather and high-heels, her targets die as much from
her bullets and kicks as they do from amazement at the tensile
properties of modern fabrics.  Regrettably as the "Casablanca"
theme emerges, the energy starts to slowly leave the film.  An
even bigger blunder is the replacement of the end of "Casablanca"
with a generic action sequence, with Barb roaring offscreen on
her motorcycle as Axel goes mano a mano with the
Congressionalists.  (Picture Rick Blaine saying: "Ilsa, here's a
gun.  Go and pop some Nazis.  I'm just going to check down the
back of the club ...")
>From a modestly promising start, "Barb Wire" heads slowly off
course and into blandness.  Nonetheless it might make acceptable
if undemanding video fodder, and Anderson's next film may prove
interesting.  [*/misfire] and lime green as a fashion statement
on the Sid and Nancy scale.
------
paul-michael agapow (agapow@latcs1.oz.au), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse
[archived at http://www.cs.latrobe.edu.au/~agapow/Postviews/]

Title
Review for Jude (1996)
Adapted from the classic Thomas Hardy novel "Jude the Obscure":
In the late 19th century young Jude Fawley (Eccleston) sets his
mind upon becoming a scholar.  However his working class
background and two romances he is doomed to continually revisit -
first with Arabella (Griffiths), an earthy working girl, and
later with his cousin Sue (Winslet), a rebellious free spirit, -
drag him away from this dream.
Two admissions to start with: (1) Having never read the Hardy
novel, I cannot vouch for how close this is to the original.
Comments in the publicity and the fact that Eccleston appears on
the movie poster wearing a beard that he never has during the
movie makes me suspect there may be wild divergences.  (2) "Jude"
is not a terrible movie.  It is just terribly disappointing.
Ready for four hours of unmitigated misery? This is it.
Admittedly the running-time is closer to two hours - it just
feels longer - but "Jude" is an movie looking for a statement to
make.  Despite its protests that it weighs the questions of
dreams versus realities and destiny versus chance, "Jude" the
movie is like the life of its eponymous character: one long
disappointment.  Jude and Sue, his companion in misery for most
of the film, do not so much rage against injustices as just lie
down and let themselves be kicked to death.  We do not need them
to win, but to simply grind them down without respite is
pointless.  "Jude" has little emotion or message invested in it.
Conversely there is merit. After a series of period movies
that stepped straight out of a postcard (or haberdashery), "Jude"
looks like a un-glamorous portrayal of its times, from the torn
edges of Jude's coat to the mud-splattered streets.  Eccleston,
looking almost anatomically gaunt, is a strangely charming lead
with a subdued natural acting style.  When he finally weeps at
his misfortunes, his pain is palpable.  The supporting actors
give appealing performances, although Winslet is not nearly as
luminous as she is in every other film she appears in.  There is
a nicely eerie soundtrack and the director shows a keen eye for
capturing scenes from the bleak distances of farmland to the
crowded interiors of urband gaslight.
But the bottom line is - why see a film that has nothing to
say?  What it really lacks is a sense of not pace but urgency, an
sense that it is going somewhere or say something.  Put it this
way - if you were watching this one on TV, after a hour you'd be
channel-surfing between tragedies.  [*/misfire] and a ski holiday
without snow on the Sid and Nancy scale.
------
paul-michael agapow (agapow@latcs1.oz.au), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse
[archived at http://www.cs.latrobe.edu.au/~agapow/Postviews/]

Title
Review for Sphere (1998)
A mysterious big alien thingie is found at the bottom of the ocean. 
The inevitable team of experts are taken down to it, left alone and
get on each others nerves before dying one by one.
"Sphere" may not be the worst Michael Crichton novel ever written, but 
then I haven't read "Binary" or "Rising Sun".  They'd have to try hard 
to beat the monosyllabic, shaggy-dog story-telling of "Sphere" the 
novel.  So, while a film of "Sphere" shouldn't be good, it can't be 
worse than its source.
But it is, yessiree.  Unfortunately, it's not bad enough to be an 
enjoyable Bad Movie, just bad enough to be tedious.
The setup is this: a mile-long (aerodynamically streamlined!)  
starship is found on the ocean floor with a large golden disco-ball 
within.  Obviously this is a case for an elite alien contact team.  
Alas, they have to make do with one headed by the narcolepsy inducing 
Dustin Hoffman.  Inevitably, a storm traps them in their seafloor base 
for the (also inevitable) monster attack.
That setup is hardly promising, but things get worse.  A military 
sidekick to the team (Queen Latifah) gets smothered by a large swarm 
of jellyfish.  As Sharon Stone (wittilly cast against type as a genius 
marine biologist / medico / biochemist / drug-addict) extracts 
tendrils from the dead Latifah's nostrils, Hoffman honks insincerely: 
"It must have been terrible.  I can't imagine the pain."  Even more 
ludicrously, we are asked to believe that the prelapsarian Hoffman and 
wonderbuff Stone were lovers.  (Stone's faux-dyke cropped hair and 
bulging eyes makes her looks positively hydrocephalic.)  Samuel L 
Jackson pops up as a brilliant mathematician with attitude who gets 
knocked out before he can do his badass shtick.  Later, the whiny 
astrophysicist (who is not a big-name actor) gets capped because he 
is not a big-name actor, and his colleagues activate the station defence 
system which starts electrical fires every time it is used. Stone 
decides that the best way to get everyone's attention is to plant 
explosives everywhere.  Slap in the fact they never explain what the 
sphere actually is or what it's doing on board the starship, the lazy 
performances, ho-hum direction, plot inanities ...
There is one good moment, where a plausible explanation for 
assembling such a disparate team is revealed.  But this is one dull 
ember in a black hole of a movie.  Barry Levison has done much better 
than this.  [*/misfire] and extracting wisdom teeth on the Sid and 
Nancy scale.
--
paul-michael agapow (agapow@computer.org), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse
"There is no adventure, there is no romance, there is only trouble and desire."

Title
Review for Mars Attacks! (1996)
A fleet of flying saucers had set off from Mars and surrounded
Earth. The President (Nicholson) wants to greet them with open
arms, reassured by his chief scientist's (Brosnan) claims that
every advanced civilisation is peaceful. His chief of the armed
forces (Steiger) seethes anger, asking for a pre-emptive strike.
Those little green guys just can't be trusted.
"Mars Attacks" came out too close on the tail of
"In-duh-pendence Day" for the former to be intended to be a send
up of the latter.  But that's what it is, a boisterous
celebration of all the cliches of oldtime (and not so old) scifi,
with angst-torn Presidents, intrepid reporters, gun-nuts,
peacenik scientists, whooping and creaking "electronic
tonalities" by Danny Elfman and of course the sadistic,
treacherous Martians.  At times the film even has that bleached
out, over-exposed look of an 50's SF film.
The Martians are a pure delight. Conversing in a strange
honking language, with bulbous and veiny skulls, exploding in a
shower of green ichor, they cheat, they lie, they gleefully run
riot with rayguns (with deathbeams of two different colours, no
less), monotonally chanting stock phrases: "Don't run away - we
are your friends".  Their computer animation is a triumph - it
may not look realistic (come on - dayglo little green men in blue
suits?)  but it is very effective. They twitch and sneer and cry
and laugh, in a completely expressive way. Their tinny flying
saucers and gothic interiors are also wonderful.
"Mars Attacks" is loaded, even over-loaded, with name actors
of whom some do amazingly good work for such a silly movie.  Jack
Nicholson acts for perhaps the first time in years, putting in a
surprisingly complex portrayal of the President.  Pierce Brosnan
and Sarah Jessica Parker are amusing, if one note, as a
pipe-puffing boffin and air-headed reporter respectively.
Annette Bening confirms that she is perhaps one of the most
under-valued actresses in Hollywood with her alcoholic new-ager.
Rod Steiger delights as a warhawk general screaming "Attack!
Attack!  Kill!  Kill!".
But this is perhaps where the big problem with "Mars Attacks"
is: there's just too much going on with little of it getting
anywhere.  The opportunity to use all these big stars seems to
have clouded Burton's judgement (and he is not a disciplined
filmmaker at the best of times), with each getting their five
minutes of screen time.  Bening, delightful as she is, and
Nicholson's second role (as a Vegas entrepreneur) should have been
snipped altogether, as could Glen Close (in a thankless role as
as the First Lady), Pam Grier and Michael J Fox.  This might have
given the remaining sections the development they sorely need at
times.
Sometimes rushed or crowded, often batty and probably for movie
and SF fans only (others are unlikely to appreciate the jokes),
"Mars Attacks" would make for a great video night with the right
audience, cheering it and themselves on.  [***/interesting] and
"coruscating beams of destruction" on the Sid and Nancy scale.
"Mars Attacks"
Directed by Tim Burton
Music by Danny Elfman.
Starring Jack Nicholson, Glen Close, Michael J Fox, Sarah
   Jessica Parker,Annette Bening, Jim Brown, Pam Grier, Danny DeVito,
   Pierce Brosnan, Tom Jones, Lukas Haas, Lisa Marie, Martin Short,
   Rod Steiger, Joe Don Baker, Natalie Portman.
Released 1996.
------
paul-michael agapow (agapow@latcs1.oz.au), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse
"There is no adventure, there is no romance, there is only trouble and desire."

Title
Review for Dark City (1998)
In grand pulp tradition, a man (Sewell) wakes up amnesiac in a hotel 
room with a dead woman.  Terrified he flees into the shadowy city, 
pursued by a puzzled cop (Hurt), his supposed wife (Connelly) and a 
group of mysterious figures cloaked in black, none of whom have 
Australian accents.  There's a deranged doctor (Sutherland) in there 
too.
The pursued amnesiac murderer is an oldie but a goodie, a hook around 
which one could build a tight and twisty plot.  But that's not what 
happens here.  The most mysterious thing about "Dark City", is why the 
plot starts shrouded in such mystery and then so easily gives up its 
secrets to lumber into a comic book action plot.  Was this intentional 
or has the writer and director (Alex "The Crow" Proyas) misjudged his 
audience?  I suspect the second, but let's look at the good things 
first.  (As always with mystery films, one must speak elliptically on 
certain plot points so as to preserve the surprise for viewers - even 
if the filmmakers don't find the surprise useful.)
>From the opening scenes, Proyas' visual style draws you in.  Our hero 
awakes in a bathtub, the camera drinking in a lazily swinging naked 
lightbulb, a syringe loose on an intricately tiled floor, a bundle of 
clothes folded loosely on a chair.  Later, we move through the 
Escher-like streets of the city to where a singer sways slowly in 
front of a microphone as her band plays in the darkness just outside 
the spotlight.  The dark city itself is a kind of painting, a 
composition carefully constructed for each shot.  Indeed, the actors 
do not so much move through each scene as just stand carefully within 
them.  Movement would disrupt the careful placement and so characters 
are more part of the scenery than part of the plot.
Although this objectifying of the cast is often bad, within "Dark 
City" it works.  William Hurt as the laconic police lieutenant is 
playing little more than a cliche, but this cliche belongs here and is 
done very well.  Likewise, Jennifer Connelly's role could best be 
described as "The Girl" and wouldn't go astray in dozens of other 
movies.  Nor does it go astray here.  Kiefer Sutherland, who was 
nearly due for lifetime membership in the Bad Movie Actors Guild 
(whether you read it as "BAD movie ACTORS" or "BAD MOVIE actors") here 
turns a surprisingly good job as the oddly pathetic collaborator Dr 
Schreber, struggling pathetically against his controllers.
But this returns us to the plot.  The sad fact is that the mystery is 
all but over 40 minutes into the film, leaving nothing but the visual 
style.  After the teasing open scene, the director is in a tearing 
hurry to explain it all to us, with a disastrous opening monologue 
which all but tells you what's going on.  (Even one of the poster 
blurbs gives the secret away.)  So by the halfway mark, the battle 
lines are drawn and all that remains is for our hero to go mano a mano 
with the bad guys.  And you don't seriously think that he's going to 
lose, do you?  This is mighty little to hang the rest of the film on.  
Actually it's surprising that Dark City works as well as it does given 
that thinness of its plot.  Some viewers might complain that "Dark 
City" is illogical.  Given the immense levels of technology and powers 
dealt with, it's more "a-logical".  Anything could happen.  It's more 
fantasy than science-fiction.  This tends to underline the 
arbitrariness and lack of mystery.
"Dark City" is thus a bit of a mixed bag, the product of a single 
person's vision that perhaps needed some tempering by an outside point 
of view to bring it to full fruition.  However, just on the basis of 
the first half and visuals I'd rate it [***/interesting] and Peter 
Greenaway on the Sid and Nancy scale.
"Dark City" (aka "Dark Empire", "Dark World")
Released 1998.
Director and writer Alex Proyas.
Starring Rufus Sewell, Jennifer Connelly, William Hurt, Ian 
        Richardson, Kiefer Sutherland, Bruce Spence, Richard O'Brien, Colin 
        Friels, John Bluthal, Melissa George.
--
Paul-Michael Agapow (p.agapow@ic.ac.uk), Dept. Biology, Imperial College
"We were too young, lived too fast and had too much technology ..."

Title
Review for Hardware (1990)
In a run-down, post-holocaust world a soldier acquires the
remains of a military robot.  He gives part of it to his lover, a
sculptress, unaware that the robot carcass is not completely dead ...
Superficially, as the plot summary above would indicate,
"Hardware" is yet another unstoppable killer piece, movies that
generally only use their genre (be it fantasy, SF or whatever) as
a thin excuse to get some unkillable monster with useful powers
of stealth or disguise chasing our heroes who will die one by one
until a spectacular (and often ambiguous) finale.  Indeed,
sometimes the SF rack at the video store looks like this is the
only idea in science fiction: "Saturn 5", "Split Second",
"Leviathan", "Deep Star Six" ad nauseum.  When competently done,
these banal roots are transcended by the movie having good
atmospheric horror ("Alien"), good action ("Predator") or making
the monster the background for another issue (the infighting of
the station crew in "The Thing").  When badly done, it's just
another slasher flick.
"Hardware" sits, at times uncomfortably, in between.  The
script and scenario are nothing to write home about, but what is
done with them is.  The characters, usually a failing of
slasher-flicks, are well drawn and sympathetic.  A by-the-numbers
video-clip sex scene (pulsing music, slow motion) is interrupted
in a incongruous way that sends up the cliche.  In an age where
people are barricaded into their homes, the (implausible) robot
literally invades the sculptress's home, rebuilding itself with
household items.  Missing the often biblical air that some of
this genre has (e.g.  this character is evil, so they will die),
the robot is also never anthromorphised, staying expressionless,
precise, mechanical and all the more terrifying for it.  The sets
and clothing also avoid the artfully distressed look of many
post-holocaust worlds.  This planet is slowly going down the
drain and has no time for fashion.
It's unfortunate therefore that at the end of it, "Hardware"
doesn't strike out on its own and be more of its own creation.
It's also unfortunate that more work hasn't come from this team.
But "Hardware" is a notch or two above its competitors and brief
about it too.  [**/ok] and walnut icecream on the Sid and Nancy
scale.
------
paul-michael agapow (agapow@latcs1.oz.au), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse
[archived at http://www.cs.latrobe.edu.au/~agapow/Postviews/]

Title
Review for City of Angels (1998)
One of the multitude of angels that looks over Los Angeles (Cage) 
falls in love with a surgeon (Ryan) who is facing personal and career 
turning points.
"City of Angels" is not a bad film, but it is a poor remake of Wim 
Wenders' "Wings of Desire".  For those who came in late, the central 
conceit is that angels walk amongst unseen amongst us.  They do not 
interfere, just witness, eavesdropping on thoughts, marvelling at the 
travails of humans, silently offering solace.  Given the growing 
popularity of angels as (strangely secular) icons of optimism and 
spirituality, it was perhaps inevitable that the aloof, (largely) 
monochrome and very European "Wings" be remade in the Hollywood mode.  
This apparently involved the use of a Waring blender to edit the 
script into an appropriately dumb form.  Where "Wings" was ponderous, 
"City" is frothy.  Where "Wings" is remote and oblique, "City" is 
superficial.  Where "Wings" is romantic, "City" is a romance.  In 
short, where "City" diverges from "Wings", it mostly does so for the 
worst.  But the result is not all bad.
It is a trifle ludicrous though.  Instead of Bruno Ganz struck with 
wonder at the dissolute acrobat Solveig Dommartin, we have Nicholas 
Cage lust-struck with idealistic heart-surgeon Meg Ryan.  (Hey, it's a 
romance.  It needs - nay, requires - Meg Ryan.)  Subtlety has quietly 
been thrown out the window.  When the angelic Cage reveals himself to 
Ryan, she gasps "You're beautiful!".  This is not - repeat, not - a 
great moment in cinema.  Cage's male pattern baldness and (ahem) 
excess of chest hair are distracting, to say the least.  A celestial 
chest wax and toupee would go a long way.  Slap in some trite 
aphorisms about the wonder of the world and love (which could only be 
uttered in a wealthy city like Los Angeles, and not one like Berlin 
wedged between two warring military powers), add an intrusive 
soundtrack, and there is every reason to expect "City of Angels" to be 
irritating.
But, for the sentimental viewer (which I confess to be), there is 
worth even in something as potentially trite as "City of Angels".  
Much like "Faraway, So Close", the somewhat mundane sequel to "Wings 
of Desire", there are moments when it beautifully flares to life.  
Angels crowd the beach, in rapture at the sunset and dawn.  A dead 
girl nostalgically remembers pyjamas.  A robber is agitated by self-doubt 
and guilt during a holdup.  A fallen angel rejoices in the mundane 
sensations of life.  Despite its lumbering gait, these ideas shine 
through and save a simple movie from becoming simple minded, and 
admitting both the wonder of complexity of life.  This mission is 
aided by the competence of some its components.  There is some 
genuinely beautiful photography in this film.  Cage and Ryan, who have 
both at times turned in cliched performances, here give two 
restrained and humane portrayals.  "City of Angels" may not be high 
art, but it is worthwhile.
"Is this God punishing me?"  whimpers a character.  "You know better
than that," his colleague answers.  And that's not a bad thought to 
take away from a movie.  [**/ok] and "Everything I Needed To Know, I
Learnt In Kindergarten" on the Sid and Nancy scale.
------
Paul-Michael Agapow (agapow@computer.org), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse
"There is no adventure, there is no romance, there is only trouble and desire."

Title
Review for Truman Show, The (1998)
Oh come on - you must have heard the plot of this one by now. A child is
raised from birth under the eyes of TV cameras, unaware that his entire
life is a top-rating television show.
"The Truman Show" has garnered a lot of prepublicity, albeit in a
passive manner and for entirely good reasons. Peter Weir is a skilled
director ("Fearless", "Witness", "Picnic at Hanging Rock" etc.). The
writer created the elegant "Gattaca". The central idea is one that has
probably occurred to everyone: What if the entire world is run for me?
How do I know it's all real? So "The Truman Show" arrives to some
expectations.
Jim Carrey, perhaps having learnt that less is more, is thankfully under
control and surprising good as the increasingly paranoid Truman. Ed
Harris gives a tour-de-force performance as Christof, the director of
"The Truman Show" who, although remote and clinical, clearly loves
Truman. And the central idea is dazzlingly realised. Truman's home town
is a hermetic environment, a physical virtual reality in which the stars
are stage lamps, the citizens line up in the morning at "first
positions", every encounter is orchestrated, and even the weather bends
to the whim of the director. A whole world of merchandising, Truman
T-shirts and Truman bars, follow and lead the TV show. It's a
breathtaking vision.
Which doesn't explain the nagging sense of disappointment when the
credits roll. What's wrong with this film? That's difficult to say. Half
of the problem, I think, is that the film assumes you know what it's
about from the very beginning. If someone were to watch "The Truman
Show" without any foreknowledge, I'd suspect they would be very puzzled
indeed and see a very different film to the one I saw. Relying on
knowledge of publicity is lazy at best.
The other half of the problem is that the script doesn't seem to know
what to do with its big setup. It has a story, but is not really about
anything. Is this a commentary about television and the media? If so,
it's a very muted one. The vast global audience watching Truman is shown
caring for his fate and cheering on his triumphs. It is only at the very
end that it dare be suggested that to them, Truman is not a person but
just entertainment. However, other possible interpretations have been
floated. Is it a metaphor for the relationship between humanity and God?
Maybe - director Christof acts fairly God-like. Is it a gloss on
paranoia and schizophrenia? Truman's behaviour lends some weight to this
theory. But still there's that feeling of uneasiness as if the film is
crying out to make a point or say something, but is being stifled. This
emptiness leads one - unfairly - to dwell on plot inconsistencies and
how clumsily the TV show is run. It becomes implausible that the
directors of Truman's life have stayed hidden from him for 30 years, so
oafish and blunt are their tricks. (The actors all have radio earphones,
yet blindly give themselves away where a few instructions from the
omniscient central control would have defused the situation. Their
search for Truman when he is lost totally shatters the illusion of the
programme, yet they hope to keep filming the show.) These are doubts
that should never occur to the viewer, and wouldn't have had the central
story been more engrossing.
In fact, "The Truman SHow" is an oddly pleasant and mild film, where one
would have expected an impactful or thoughtful one. It's still a good
film, but one that's good despite its realisation. [***/interesting] and
a reproduction of a good painting on the Sid and Nancy scale.
--
Paul-Michael Agapow (p.agapow@ic.ac.uk), Dept. Biology, Imperial College
"We were too young, we lived too fast and had too much technology ..."

Title
Review for Ganheddo (1989)
The computer Chiron-5 went rogue in 2025 and took over the
factory island 8JO. 13 years later a group of scavengers arrive
to steal valuable computer chips.  When they and a team of Texas
Air Rangers are slaughtered by Chiron, the survivors (Takashima
and Bakke) must team up to reactivate the killer robot Gunhed so
as to defeat Chiron.
It didn't look so bad to start with.  There are some nice
shots of massive half-seen robots lurching about in the dark, big
sets and the prospect of the slinky Brenda Bakke (Selina Coombs
from TV's "American Gothic") as a hard-bitten Texas Ranger.  But
no.
Hamstring by the perpetually sulky Takashima (as crack
mechanic Brooklyn, with a charisma deficit so severe that he'll
be in arrears until the year 2020) and poor quality dubbing (even
Bakke doesn't mesh with her own voice) "Gunhed" combines the
problems of anime with the difficulties of a live production.
The initially impressive robots are revealed to be completely
inflexible, sub-Anderson creations that cannot move their arms or
head.  A "diving bell for head" android appears to menace the
group but it mostly just reminds you of "Robot Monster".  Two
irritating children materialise by which point you're shouting
"Chiron - I knew Skynet.  And you're no Skynet!"
One of the lovable aspects of anime is its completely
demented logic. (Where do the Puma sisters keep their guns?
What's so wonderful about A-ko? Surely someone would notice the
Knight Sabers taking off and landing from their condo hideout?)
But "Gunhed" is just completely demented, so arbitrary as to be
impossible to follow. Characters appear and disappear at random,
act on whim and the layout of the factory doesn't even have the
logic of a computer game. Focus on that line in the credits
"Produced by: Gunhed Production Committee".
Hideous.  [*/misfire] and bad improvisational jazz on the Sid
and Nancy scale.
------
paul-michael agapow (agapow@latcs1.oz.au), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse
[archived at http://www.cs.latrobe.edu.au/~agapow/Postviews/]
